_	Isolationism was strong, Adkins argues, because of the fear that Eastern bankers and industrialists forced the United States into World War I to enlarge their profits.
_	One of the key considerations for the government in this recruitment of settlers was the fear that Americans would stream North and settle the southern parts of what would become the provinces of Alberta and Saskatchewan.
_	Kiyoshi Takeuchi, sociology professor at the Sophia university, describes the young generation to have less "ambition and motivation" as a result from the fear that a wrong move could have negative effects.
_	Koenig and his collaborators also go to great lengths to educate the reader about negative effects of belief and orthodoxies... such as the fear that disease is punishment for sin, and that assistance is preferably derived through miracles rather than through medicine.
_	There were two main reasons for this – the first and principal reason was the fear that German bombers could use the VHF transmission waves of television as a perfect guiding beam for homing into the centre of London.
_	As Alsace and Lorraine were incorporated in the German Empire in 1871 as a result of the Franco-Prussian War, the fear that France would start another war in order to regain Alsace-Lorraine developed in Germany.
_	Ball entertainment is a closely guarded secret, not least because of the fear that other committees will 'free ride' by booking an act already booked at another ball and thus have to pay a reduced fee because the band is in Cambridge already, whilst simultaneously devaluing the 'get' by the initial contractor.
_	Wright attributes this to the fear that many Scientologists have of bringing shame upon Scientology and of being forced to break off contact with their families and friends.
_	Los Angeles-based interests largely stayed away from the Bills, citing concerns over the stadium's lease and the fear that politicians will place intense scrutiny on any person who attempts to move the Bills out of Buffalo; multibillionaire Eli Broad declined to place a bid on the team for those reasons.
_	Even worse, was the fear that a more powerful Argentine Army would launch a surprise attack on the weaker Brazilian Army.
_	However, the fear that the B-58's integral wing tanks would make it vulnerable to ground fire during low-altitude delivery lead to the abandonment of the program.
_	Ibn Ezra ridicules the fear that the tekufah water will cause swelling, and ascribes the belief to the "gossip of old women" (ib.).
_	"Helmet in the Bush" was about Davis' drug abuse, and the fear that gripped him at the height of his drug problem.
_	He was asked to dismiss the complaints by many peers for the fear that it would cost him his job, but he refused.
_	She revealed that she was initially nervous about joining "Home and Away", saying "there is the fear that at some point you are going to be in a bikini, and that did play on my mind.
_	This decision was apparently made in the fear that the Prince's life would be in jeopardy from an aspirant for the Empire of Abyssinia.
_	Siembieda stated that he had not wanted to make public Sheiring's identity out of the fear that overzealous fans might get into trouble by committing acts of reprisal.
_	The most important reason for the introduction of a common environmental policy was the fear that trade barriers and competitive distortions in the Common Market could emerge due to the different environmental standards.
_	At rehab, Ricky admits that what he was chasing was the feeling of fame, fortune, and popularity that he had years prior, as well as trying to fight the fear that the feeling wouldn't come back.
_	Smalley then discussed the fear that the nanorobots could mutate and reproduce indefinitely, causing a grey goo scenario, or, referring to Bill Joy's previous article "Why the future doesn't need us", that the nanorobots could develop swarm intelligence and become alive in some sense.
_	Owens echoes the fear that allowing gay soldiers would be deleterious to unit cohesion on the battlefield, arguing that concern for one's lover in a given unit could override any sense of loyalty to the unit as a whole, particularly in situations of life and death.
_	The minutes of the IMF Executive Board were revealed nearly four years later, and highlight amongst other items, the fear that Greek social cohesion could be at risk.
_	Problems for the expedition begin when Joe, in charge of the engine room, is driven mad by the fear that the submarine cannot survive such depths.
_	One reason for preferring dualism is precisely the fear that national judges are not familiar with international law - a highly complex field of law - and hence are liable to make mistakes.
_	This coincided with British capturing Castine, Maine in 1814 which created the fear that any part of the New England coast might be subject to attack but no attacks were made against Massachusetts.
_	In 2000, Gym led a campaign called the "Stadium Out of Chinatown Coalition" against the construction of a baseball stadium north of Chinatown, due to the fear that it might result in gentrification of the area.
_	With such a serious injury like this one, clubs became afraid of hiring me, with the fear that some tendon would rupture again, so I sit forgotten in Benfica B".
_	With his worries heightened by the fear that he is about to go blind, he falls into a deep depression and becomes a shadow of the happy soul he used to be.
_	So far this does not appear to have happened, although some commentators have noted that because the total CDS exposure of a bank is not public knowledge, the fear that one could face large losses or possibly even default themselves was a contributing factor to the massive decrease in lending liquidity during September/October 2008.
_	When she still did not report several days later, however, the fear that she had been lost began to grow.
_	The francisca also had a psychological effect, in that, on the throwing of the francisca, the enemy might turn and run in the fear that another volley was coming.
_	He addressed the problem of Egyptian labor, distrust of political parties, which have tried to co-opt labor's causes, and the fear that demonstrations would be brutally suppressed by the government.
_	Furthermore, given that under Locarno, Britain and Italy were obliged to defend Germany if France should invade, from the German viewpoint, it made sense to continue to abide by Locarno, given the fear that France might march when Germany repudiated the disarmament clauses of Versailles in March 1935.
_	This policy may come from the fear that competitors will slash prices, and shoppers may comparison shop.
_	Although Edna may not be able to name the fear that has driven her out of her own house, she appears to be quite capable of naming the things that other people are doing wrong in their lives.
_	Macaulay made note of the fear that Voltaire's very name incited in tyrants and fanatics.
_	Seeing the people in his village as potential man-eaters, he is gripped by the fear that everyone, including his brother, his venerable doctor and his neighbors, who are crowding about watching him, are harboring cannibalistic thoughts on him.
_	He alleges that former members have been silenced by the fear that their "confidential" secrets will be used in blackmail against them.
_	Though this was the first case of ethnic cleansing by the Soviet Union, large-scale resettlement was delayed until 1937 out of the fear that Japan might consider it "casus belli".
_	Added to this is the fear that his girlfriend Joo-young will leave him.
_	Her main reason for the decision is the fear that she will lose genital sensitivity and never have another orgasm.
_	He reveals his vulnerability when he relates the fear that he felt when D'Amato died in 1985.
_	While the B-29 was still considered useful in the post World War II inventory, the numerous problems with development, (i.e. including the freezing of the design in 1942) and the fear that the postwar US Congress would not fund the purchase of a design that still had significant quantity in storage, led to the radically redeveloped B-29D being redesignated the B-50A.
_	Although the Aviation Systems Command was tasked with managing the system development, the Army Aviation Branch was generally hostile to the RPV in the fear that it would reduce the need for pilots and it competed for funds with the AHIP OH-58D program.
_	"Moral blackmail — the fear that any criticism of Israeli policy and U.S. support for it will lead to charges of anti-Semitism — is a powerful disincentive to publish dissenting views...
_	Mason argued that the Nazi leaders were deeply haunted by the November Revolution of 1918, and was most unwilling to see any fall in working class living standards out of the fear that it might provoke another November Revolution.
_	A secret society known as the Tabula Rasa formed after this failure; its directive is to prevent the use of magic on the Earth, motivated by the fear that such a disaster may occur again.
_	The fall of Sardis was a major shock to the powers of the region; the Greek poets Callinus and Archilochus recorded the fear that it inspired in the Greek colonies of Ionia, some of which were attacked by Cimmerian and Treres raiders.
_	Additionally, the fear that Britain would appear weak or unstable following a mass decolonisation of territory was of great concern to many Conservatives at the time of the speech.
_	Malaysia's subsequent reluctance to go ahead with the 1990 agreement was based on the fear that it might eventually be forced to give up proprietary control over some or all of KTM's land in Singapore.
_	It is revealed in season 3's "Don't Hate the Player" that Claudia's experience in the psychiatric hospital has left her with the fear that her life is not real, but a creation of her imagination and she is still locked in the institution being given electroshock therapy.
_	István as a pious, deeply affected, somewhat "Hamlet-y", yet finally determined man; Koppány as a passionate character who knows what he wants, yet is not power-hungry, but is rather led by his respect for tradition and the fear that tradition would disappear through the "foreigners" István is bringing into the land.
_	And his lyricism, the making of beautiful sentences, is always an answering back against the fear that we may never do better than we are doing now.
_	At the heart of the protests however, has been the fear that the ECFA might be lead to reunification with Beijing, which sees the island as a Chinese province.
_	At the beginning of the series, Buffy has left behind a destructive past that has labeled her as a trouble-maker at school and instilled in her the fear that the actions she has had to take to be a successful Slayer are responsible for breaking apart her parents' marriage.
_	Kamsa imprisoned Devaki and Vasudevar due to the fear that their eighth son Krishna who is to be born soon would be his terminator from the earth.
_	As soon as Norman Osborn shoots the LMD in the head, Phobos reveals himself, inflicting Osborn with the fear that he will lose his mind soon enough.
_	Because of the fear that the miasma from the sewers would cause the spread of disease, Chadwick and his successor, the pathologist John Simon, ensured that the sewers were regularly flushed through, a policy that resulted in more sewage being discharged into the Thames.
_	This, together with the fear that he had aggravated the condition of the children of Israel, confused his mind so that he uttered disrespectful words to God (Exodus 5:22).
_	Educational literature and literature in college curricula were especially targeted under McCarthyism due to the fear that communism will be taught to students.
_	Leading Buddhist monks opposed devolution of power that would grant regional autonomy to Tamils on the basis of Mahavamsa worldview that the entire country is a Buddhist promised land which belongs to the Sinhalese Buddhist people, along with the fear that devolution would eventually lead to separate country.
_	Hughes explicitly articulated the fear that if emergency powers are beyond court scrutiny then soon all government action will be characterized as an emergency."
_	Amir Rapaport of Makor Rishon wrote, "The main reason for the low profile in which the incident was dealt with was the fear that public announcement will make it difficult for Hamas to return Mengistu to Israel, since a massive [Palestinian] public pressure will be applied to Hamas to not return him without an extensive deal of prisoners swap".
_	It is characterised by a hesitation, reluctance or avoidance, to perform an action based on the fear that it will offend someone or cause someone to lose face, or become embarrassed.
_	Claude M. Steele suggested that minority children and adolescents may also experience stereotype threat—the fear that they will be judged to have traits associated with negative appraisals and/or stereotypes of their race or ethnic group.
_	Ultimately, operation Kufire signified the fear that communism would spread throughout Latin American.
_	He wrote that "the only conceivable justification for an unannounced search of an innocent citizen is the fear that, if notice were given, he would conceal or destroy the object of the search."
_	She returns indoors and is seized by the fear that she could have been killed.
_	I don’t believe that people can ever really know what it is like to be someone else (I will never know the fear that black parents may have) but neither are we all completely unknowable."
_	He also dealt with the fear that he would not be able to do his job properly after he returned from the hospital, and this fear was intensified when Jack told him he had added a new agent to the team.
_	The idea that we are moving toward a fully digital, paperless society is accompanied by the fear that we may soon—or currently—be facing a digital dark age, in which older media are no longer accessible on modern devices or using modern methods of scholarship.
_	In 1938, Weizsäcker was opposed to the general trend in German foreign policy of attacking Czechoslovakia out of the fear that it might cause a general war that Germany would lose; Weizsäcker had no moral objections to the idea of destroying Czechoslovakia and was only opposed to the timing of the attack.
_	At that time it did not allow for the laity to receive the consecrated wine at Mass, partly due to the fear that the laity might abuse it; priests and bishops drank the consecrated wine.
_	The motives were twofold: the fear that an increase in female offspring would result in economic burden, as well as the fear of the humiliation frequently caused by girls being captured by a hostile tribe and subsequently preferring their captors to their parents and brothers.
_	The prosecution was criticized for dismissing any potential juror who knew Milam or Bryant, for the fear that such a juror would vote to acquit.
_	In 1931, the Alfonso Guillen Zelaya Honduran intellectual, raised the huge black presence on the north coast and the fear that if increased which what he called the "black import" Honduras ended up being a country of mulatto, however, already then, the country was mostly mestizo and indigenous population had been growing over the years.
_	The Congress, however, denied him from getting such license for the fear that he might use it as vehicles for propaganda for his brother who was then running for a second term in the Presidential elections of 1953.
_	In the case of the New World French there was also the fear that the new population was potentially more loyal to a foreign king, that of France, than to Britain.
_	Mark Potok, a senior fellow at the SPLC, said in an interview that the group has no history of political violence, but that, "The core ideas of these groups relate to the fear that elites in this country and around the world are slowly and steadily and nefariously moving us towards a one-world government, the so-called New World Order."
_	He wrote in an article for "Prospect" magazine that his campaign against "Crash" was motivated by the fear that "Cronenberg's film might well have a "copycat effect" on a few unstable individuals" and could "also have a far more insidious longterm effect by eroticising sado-masochism and orthopaedic fetishism for people previously unaware of being turned on by acts of mutilation."
_	During the war they were relocated for security reasons because of the fear that Axis bombs would destroy the photographic equipment used for the war effort.
_	Bet officials believe that the vast majority of settlers reject price tag attacks both on moral grounds, prohibiting harm to innocent people and due to the Halachic prohibition which such actions, and on practical grounds, due to the fear that such acts are actually harmful to the settlement movement in the West Bank.
_	The Borg had not been seen in full force since the fourth-season episode of "The Next Generation", "", and had never been heavily featured in the series due to budget constraints and the fear that they would lose their scare factor.
_	Modern critics have argued, however, that these concerns were based on the fear that readers – especially women – could escape their familial and communal obligations and transgress moral boundaries by losing themselves in the private fantasy worlds that books made available.
_	She revealed that she was initially nervous about joining "Home and Away", saying "There is the fear that at some point you are going to be in a bikini, and that did play on my mind.
_	Ludwig Tieck's biography of Novalis describes Sophie, saying: "Even as a child, she gave an impression which--because it was so gracious and spiritually lovely--we must call superearthly or heavenly, while through this radiant and almost transparent countenance of hers we would be struck with the fear that it was too tender and delicately woven for this life, that it was death or immortality which looked at us so penetratingly from those shining eyes; and only too often a rapid withering motion turned our fear into an actual reality."
_	James Warburg, member of the United States Senate Committee on Foreign Relations, testified before the committee on March 28, 1952 and observed that the Soviet proposal might be a bluff, but it seemed "that our government is afraid to call the bluff for the fear that it may not be a bluff at all" and might lead to "a free, neutral, and demilitarized Germany", which might be "subverted into Soviet orbit".
_	Some details from Williams' book were not used in the film, e.g. the escaped POWs discussing the possibility of visiting potentially neutral brothels in Germany, an idea that was abandoned because of the fear that it might be a trap.
_	In 2016, a project the company was developing that would provide customers with next generation sequencing was ended, because of the fear that the results would be too complicated or vague to fit into the company's goal of providing useful information directly to consumers, both quickly and precisely, according to CEO Anne Wojcicki.
_	The destructive forces of fadenya eventually cause Sundiata and his mother to be exiled from Mali, in the fear that Sassouma would hurt Sogolon's family.
_	In the episode, Dr. Izzie Stevens (Katherine Heigl) returns to the fictional Seattle Grace Mercy West Hospital with the fear that her estranged husband Dr. Alex Karev (Justin Chambers) is moving on.
_	Li responded, "Tao's fear today is like the fear that Your Honor had then.
_	i.e. the fear that the unclear legal and factual situation could actually amount to a de facto transfer of the License from CET21 to ČNTS, in violation of Media Law.""
_	Because of the fear that heresy was hereditary, the outcome of this trial involving conversos and Jews, was used to argue for purity of blood (limpieza de sangre) in those aspiring to join the clergy of the archdiocese of Toledo.
_	Leaving aside the fear that these practices would generate crime, the presence of betel nut beauties also distracted drivers and caused more car accidents.
_	To cope with jungle conditions (and the fear that their tall white pith helmets would attract sniper fire), the 79th Battery were issued with the Australian Akubra slouch hat, which they wore with the Royal Artillery cap badge.
_	Attachment anxiety is related to controlling, overinvolved, intrusive, and compulsive caregiving (e.g., preoccupation with the fear that the partner will leave them if they do not provide adequate care).
_	This demonstrates the cultural division and the fear that “civilized” children have for what they consider to be "uncivilized" and mystical.
_	After finding that doctor Bosković was arrested in Zagreb, members of the secret pressroom decided that they are not going to keep the house rented on his name, because of the fear that the police may find out about his arrest.
_	On 17 March 1982, Runcie gave a speech to the National Society for the Promotion of Christianity in which he said that Christianity should play a crucial part in the religious education of all pupils, even if they were non-Christian: "While recognising that a truly pluralistic society should not merely tolerate diversity but value and nurture it, I must also express the fear that at times we seem tempted to sacrifice too much of our native Christian tradition on the altar of multi-culturalism."
_	The Quran reports that Aaron stated that he did not act due to the fear that Moses would blame him for causing divisions among the Israelites.
_	The University of Minnesota's Lion Research Project describes one reason to delay the introduction of lions to Kuno Palpur, is the fear that tigers living there would kill the incoming lions.
_	The elector, however, was continually haunted by the fear that the Ernestines would attempt to deprive him of the coveted dignity, and his policy both in Saxony and the wider Holy Roman Empire was coloured by this fear.
_	An operation was launched against Mohajir Qaumi Movement in 2002 after they secured a seat of National Assembly from Landhi constituency because Altaf Hussain felt the fear that with the rise of Afaq Ahmed, his politics might fail.
_	Social psychologist Claude Steele suggests that minority children and adolescents may also experience stereotype threat—the fear that they will be judged to have traits associated with negative appraisals and/or stereotypes of their race or ethnic group which produces test anxiety and keeps them from doing as well as they could on tests.
_	The United Kingdom, like all 47 Member States of the Council of Europe, is a signatory to the European Convention of Human Rights, and is prohibited by Article 3 from using the death penalty so there is no longer the fear that an innocent man may be executed.
_	She continued "[Carmel] just doesn't know what to do, because she's always wanted a perfect life, a gorgeous husband, lovely children – and the thing that hits her now is [the fear that] no-one will fancy her anymore, no-one will want to be with her.
_	Over the entire period of their acquaintance, Shekhar can never bring himself to let Kaveri know that he's in love with her for the fear that he might lose her just as he lost his beloved step-mother.
_	Moreover, by the early 1930s, the German Protestant middle classes were gripped with the fear that the German Communist Party would use the great unemployed masses made available by the Great Depression to stage a revolution, which caused much of the Protestant middle class, starting in 1930 to vote Nazi as the "party of order" that would crush Marxism in Germany.
_	In response to Dahl's op-ed, NBC Chicago political journalist Mark W. Anderson, who attended Disco Demolition aged 15, described the fear that white neighborhoods would be taken over by blacks and the anxiety around shifting pop culture trends.
_	It was the fear that Strachan would seize him and hand him over to the English that led Charles II to make his temporary flight from Perth in October.
_	This put to rest the fear that any proof involving infinitesimals might be unsound, provided that they were manipulated according to the logical rules that Robinson delineated.
_	The objection of the British to Kurdish self-rule sprang from the fear that success of an independent Kurdish area would tempt the two Arab areas of Baghdad and Basra to follow suit, hence endangering the direct British control over all Mesopotamia.
_	Returning to make his first flight, Page was seized with the fear that he would become trapped in a burning aircraft.
_	Still, the fear that war might come before Germany was prepared for it served to create a sense of urgency and reinforced the rearmament program.
_	Sartre also remarked on conversations at the Café de Flore between intellectuals had changed, as the fear that one of them might be a "mouche" (informer) or a writer of the "corbeau" (anonymous denunciatory letters) meant that no-one really said what they meant anymore, imposing self-censorship.
_	Stereotype threat arises from the fear that one's actions will confirm a negative stereotype about one's in-group.
_	AB has lessened the emphasis on condoms due to the confusing nature of teaching the two simultaneously and the fear that condoms undermine the message of abstinence.
_	Anselmo spoke about the song "Hard Lines, Sunken Cheeks" saying "I think it was a foreshadowing of the fear that I felt of not being the same.
_	This would require Annex I countries to agree to deeper cuts in emissions of greenhouse gases in order to create a market for the carbon credits from REDD+, which is unlikely to happen soon given the current state of negotiations in the COP, but even then there is the fear that the market will be flooded with carbon credits, depressing the price to levels where REDD+ is no longer an economically viable option.
_	However, this proposal was withdrawn ten days later due to the estimated cost of $2.7 million and the fear that the vote would prove even more divisive to the community.
_	The present unpopularity of MDA is not only due to doubts regarding the health benefit of this intervention but to the fear that MDAs will facilitate the spread of drug resistance.
_	On 1 September 1944, USAAF General Carl Spaatz expressed the fear that if greater numbers of German jets appeared, they could inflict losses heavy enough to force cancellation of the Allied bombing offensive by daylight.
_	Many see the worst part about PCS to be the fear that this chest pain is an indicator of a heart attack or other more serious condition.
_	Bianca develops the fear that she is using Maggie as a replacement to Frankie, and the sexual tension between the two causes Bianca to push Maggie into briefly dating good guy Tim Dillon.
_	All the members of the group had received previously severe terms in prison, so for some there was the fear that the Cavnic incident may lead to the capital punishment.
_	With responses from 14 participants, researchers found that the use of mental imagery helped these people to feel more powerful and in some cases "profoundly affected" in favorable ways their views of themselves—for example, relieving them of the fear that they would forget their inhaler and die from an asthma attack.
_	Concerns over the preference of Hindi in central government jobs, civil service examinations and the fear that English would be replaced with Hindi as medium of instruction brought students into the anti-Hindi imposition agitation camp in large numbers.
_	This is a Keystone comedy, having said which you proceed to qualify with all the adjectives standing for funny, burlesque, grotesque, farcical or screaming that you can think of, and leave with the fear that you have not done it justice.
_	A broader understanding of biosecurity that is emerging under threat of biological warfare, and the fear that such economically devastating events as the mad cow disease epidemic could recur, either deliberately (as an act of bioterrorism) or by accident due to unrestricted imports, is causing some nations, notably New Zealand, to adopt relatively harsh restrictions against imported organisms.
_	If we could banish from our midst both the obloquy which some heap upon the Theoric Fund, and also the fear that the Fund will not be maintained without doing a great deal of harm, we could not perform a greater service nor one more likely to strengthen the whole body politic."” (4.35-37)
_	The Court determined that the plaintiff's claim was based on the fear that sometime in the future the Army might cause harm with information retrieved during their surveillance, but that there was no present threat.
_	He expressed the fear that American bombs might kill enough Iranians so that Israel will "establish control over the entire theatre and those who presently live there will become Jewish serfs—like the Palestinians."
_	Cynthia's family include: her uncle Percival, an inventor; her cousin Natalia, a macabre, vampire-like creature; Cornwallis, a hammy ex-actor; her uncle Reginald; Grandfather, who lies bedridden upstairs; and cousin Muldoon, who is kept locked up in the fear that he will harm someone.
_	Llywelyn had no alternative but to comply, and he later stated that he did it under duress, 'moved by the fear that can grip a steadfast man'.
_	He was renowned as perhaps the toughest tackler of his day, giving rise to the (probably apocryphal) story that his wife once expressed the fear that he would "come home one day with a broken leg."
_	Lieutenant-Colonel Ernest Swinton expressed the fear that tanks armed in such a way might be unable to protect themselves from attacks by large numbers of enemy infantry.
_	Patrick also notes that the RoC government encouraged the return of the Malia Turkish Cypriots, along with Turkish Cypriot residents of three other grape-producing villages, because of the economic importance of the island’s wine industry and the fear that the large untended Turkish Cypriot vineyards would be destroyed.
_	In 2008 President George W. Bush agreed to remove the DPRK from the list after North Korea met their obligations to provide access to their nuclear program and the resumption of disabling of their nuclear facilities, but continued hostilities and the fear that North Korea could sell nuclear weapons to terrorist organizations have called for the nation to be relisted.
_	DeMain did not retract his allegations that Peltier was guilty of the murders of the FBI agents and that the motive for Aquash's murder was the fear that she might inform on the activist.
_	Increasing conflict with leopards and the fear that this generated led to a series of campaigns to exterminate them.
_	Part of the discomfort that some Heathens feel toward "seiðr" surrounds the lack of any criteria by which the community can determine whether the "seiðr"-worker has genuinely received divine communication, and the fear that it will be used by some practitioners merely to bolster their own prestige.
_	However, the rather hazily phrased British statement linking British security to French "sécurité" was not disallowed out of the fear that it would irreparably damage Anglo-French relations, which as the British historian A. J. P. Taylor observed, meant should France become involved in a war with Germany, there would be at a minimum a strong moral case because of the statement of March 19, 1936 for Britain to fight on the side of France.
_	As a result, he subsequently lived with the fear that his life would be short.
_	Also hurting DeSoto was its design, almost exactly like that of Chrysler, except for the grille and the blade styled tail lights, also drove consumers into Chrysler showroom where they bought the almost identical Chrysler Windsor without the fear that it would be an orphan like the DeSoto was bound to be, and soon.
_	In 1992, the government of Japan justified its continued refusal to allow oral contraceptives to be distributed in Japan on the fear that it would lead to reduced condom use, and thus increase transmission of AIDS.
_	The irony in this story includes Paul viewing the sea as a place of safety, but once he gets there, he is still unable to rid himself of the fear that embodies him.
_	Although ISIS branches have not yet reached the land of Southeast Asia in big masses, there is the fear that it is only a matter of time until Indonesias small extremist groups grow in masses once direct contact with ISIS is made.
_	Some talented musicians avoided joining all female bands in the fear that their talent would be disregarded in such a context.
_	Anti-Catholicism among many of the English was grounded in the fear that the pope sought to reimpose not just religio-spiritual authority over England but also secular power of the country; this was seemingly confirmed by various actions by the Vatican.
_	Though still concerned about slavery, Van Buren and his followers returned to the Democratic fold, partly out of the fear that a continuing Democratic split would help the Whig Party.
_	Around 1950 the new "Sverdlov"-class cruisers caused concern in the Royal Navy, over the fear that the Soviet Navy was expanding into a wide-ranging blue water navy.
_	In 2007, California and several other U.S. states asked a district judge to extend most of Microsoft's antitrust case settlement for another five years, citing "a number of concerns, including the fear that Microsoft could use the next version of Windows to 'tilt the playing field' toward Silverlight, its new Adobe Flash competitor," says a "Seattle Post-Intelligencer" article.
_	The British Macmillan stated that the name had already been causing confusion with the public resulting in misdirected book orders and the fear that the American company was planning to use the name to compete unfairly in markets where the British company was active.
_	Environmental criticism has also been brought to attention due to the fear that the beltway would cause immense sprawl.
_	In Zweibrücken the reservations were based on the fear that the town would now be exposed to considerable smoke pollution.
_	A Major percentage of the people who converted had to leave their homes for the fear that they might be ill-treated for converting their religion/caste.
_	A major aspect of many conspiracy theories is the fear that large agribusinesses, especially Monsanto are working to undermine the health and safety of the general public by introducing and promoting GMOs in the food supply.
_	The law may originally have been conceived by the Senate due to the fear that material wealth gained from gold and silver mining operations would allow the Macedonians to fund an armed rebellion.
_	Inoculation was already a standard practice but involved serious risks, one of which was the fear that those inoculated would then transfer the disease to those around them due to their becoming carriers of the disease.
_	The British officials then asked a number of questions about Israel’s operational plans, evidently inspired by the fear that the Israeli operation would not amount to a real act of war and that, consequently, Britain would not have a credible "casus belli" for military intervention.
_	Fischer's campaign claimed that she had made many mistakes as a foreign minister, and expressed the fear that a conservative president would not be an appropriate counterweight to a conservative government.
_	In the end the Radical option won because of the fear that if union with Serbia was not realized immediately, Vojvodina might find itself outside of Serbia in the end.
_	To reach his goal, he used an item dubbed the , an archaeologist's brush with the names of his family inscribed on it, to overcome the fear that would go along with sacrificing them to reach his goal, eventually making him go mad.
_	The period in which Maylam conducted his research was one that was witnessing increased interest in the recording of Britain's rural folk culture, in particular by members of the professional classes—of which Maylam was a member—in part due to the fear that such traditions were rapidly dying out.
_	This created a minor controversy, as speculation surfaced that Coolio had actually given permission but later claimed he had not in the fear that allowing the parody would not be seen as "cool", or that Yankovic's record label had lied to Yankovic in the hopes that the song would become popular.
_	However, other contentions have been made as explanations for the invisibility of women in regard to theoretical approaches, such as: females have an '...apparently low level of offending'); that they pose less of a social threat than their male counterparts; that their 'delinquencies tend to be of a relatively minor kind', but also due to the fear that including women in research could threaten or undermine theories, as Thrasher and Sutherland feared would happen with their research.
_	Manuel Valls, under the fear that the law wouldn't find a majority in the National Assembly, decided to push the law through with the 49.3 procedure.
_	Though they knew that Lucifer was not foolish enough to toy with the gate, there was always the fear that it could fall into the hands of someone who would.
_	However, the weight of tradition and the fear that a deviation from the established formula might have unintended legal consequences makes lawyers reluctant to revise the traditional formulae, and their clients, seeing them, at least draw the satisfaction of knowing that their documents appear to be written by a lawyer.
_	There was talk of building a road from Peshawar, but this was rejected because of the expense and the fear that the Russians could use the road too.
_	Liberal Parisians were further enraged by the fear that a concentration of Royal troops—brought in from frontier garrisons to Versailles, Sèvres, the Champ de Mars, and Saint-Denis—would attempt to shut down the National Constituent Assembly, which was meeting in Versailles.
_	Originally, the plans called for two twin towers to be built, but those plans were scrapped in favor of a single tower due to the fear that the occupancy level would never reach near capacity.
_	Indeed, moderate financial panic occurred driven—at least partially—by the fear that other investors are about to panic and sell.
_	The mass production of these works of art as parasites on the body of a commercial IC goes unnoticed by most observers and is discouraged by semiconductor corporations, primarily from the fear that the presence of the artwork (which is clearly unneeded) will interfere with some necessary function in the chip or design flow.
_	So great was Grant's support among Republicans that many in Congress were reluctant to impeach Johnson due to the fear that it would prevent Grant from becoming president.
_	This act represented the fear that foreign nations, including allies, would gain the technology and use it against the U.S.
_	The ship was used as a dock with the Allied occupation; after the war's end, given that the structures of the ship were still in a good condition, it was considered the possibility of salvaging it and transforming it into an anti-aircraft cruiser (to be included in the Navy in the place of the old cruiser ), but the lack of financial means and the fear that the Allied Commission would oppose the proposal, led to "Muzio Attendolo" being raised and scrapped instead.
_	Although the practice forces users to register the searched-for domains from Network Solutions, Network Solutions defends the practice, claiming that ""This protection measure provides our customers the opportunity to register domains they have previously searched without the fear that the name will be already taken through Front Running.""
_	They laugh at each other, reaching across the fear that is always pumping through their veins.
_	They write, "the fear that Palestinian troops may turn their weapons on the IDF stems from the precedent of what occurred with the outbreak of the second intifada 10 years ago, when Palestinian troops nurtured and trained by the U.S. and even by the IDF engaged in a fullscale armed action against Israel."
_	Isolationism was strong, Atkins argues, because of the fear that Eastern bankers and industrialists forced the United States into World War I to enlarge their profits.
_	The common enemy (the Akwamus) having been driven away, and besides the fear that they might return, came the need to institute an internal security system to face any future eventuality.
_	Joseph Tsai, executive vice-chairman of Alibaba Group, said that the fear that Alibaba's ownership would compromise editorial independence "reflects a bias of its own, as if to say newspaper owners must espouse certain views, while those that hold opposing views are 'unfit'.
_	The most publicized concerns from environmentalists about the incineration of municipal solid wastes (MSW) involve the fear that it produces significant amounts of dioxin and furan emissions.
_	In case of phobophobia, a panic attack might be encountered as the fear that they will in fact experience the calamities of the feared phobia and see it as something inevitable.
_	A delegation from the prisoners' committee, which included Colonel Bogislaw von Bonin, who had been imprisoned for allowing a retreat on the Eastern Front, made contact with the Wehrmacht headquarters in Bozen and made the identity of the high-status prisoners known as well as the fear that they were to be executed before liberation by US troops.
_	Spain's "ragged and ill-fed soldiers" were also suffering with the onset of winter, the fear that they would likely "fall on the populace with the utmost savagery" in revenge attacks and looting was a growing concern to Wellington as the Allied forces pushed to the French border.
_	While Amundsen was confident in his men and equipment, he was, Hassel recorded, tormented by thoughts of Scott's motor sledges and the fear that these would carry the British party to success.
_	Lawrence's fear is specifically the fear that the white race will be supplanted".
_	The Lamanites were immovable because of the cloud of darkness which did overshadow them and the fear that it struck within them.
_	She said that she still couldn't rid herself of the fear that her three captors would recapture her.
_	Basu explained "I had the fear that I would see Priyanka Chopra in the character and Jhilmil wouldn’t work.
_	She divorced Reptil due to the emotional strain on both of them and their daughter, as well as the fear that she will treat her daughter as her father treated her.
_	However, the theatre's rapid and faulty construction led to many problems, not the least of which was the fear that it could collapse at any moment.
_	This statement shows that the fear that comes when young children go into surgery can be a serious matter because they are still traumatized by the effects for weeks after the surgery has taken place.
_	Mason argued that the Nazi leadership, deeply haunted by the November Revolution of 1918, was most unwilling to see any fall in working-class living-standards out of the fear that it might provoke another November Revolution.
_	Anti-Catholicism among many of the English was grounded in the fear that the pope sought to reimpose not just religio-spiritual authority over England but also secular power in alliance with arch-enemy France or Spain.
_	In early African captivity drums were used to provide rhythm, but they were banned in later years because of the fear that Africans would use them to communicate in a rebellion; nevertheless, Africans managed to generate percussion and percussive sounds, using other instruments or their own bodies.
_	Ho contends that, based on the objective test set out in "Chng Suan Tze", the fear that the courts will take over responsibility for national security matters is misplaced.
_	Because of the fear that his mails would be intercepted by the Spanish police he went to the Barcelona airport and ask passengers waiting to board to carry his mails.
_	Such haste was due in good part to the fear that the June plan might not be definitive and therefore it was thought safer to occupy the allotted territories and place everyone before a "fait accompli".
_	Calef's book "More Wonders of the Invisible World"was inspired by the fear that Mather would succeed in once again stirring up new witchcraft trials, and the need to bear witness to the horrible experiences of 1692.
_	That, and the fear that they're going to kill someone in your car."
_	She loves the car, but is unable to shake the fear that Ranger will demand something from her in the future - and that she will be unable to refuse.
_	Many women decide to have an abortion because of the fear that they will not be able to care for the child.
_	Lutheran authorities treated Catholics harshly — in the fear that they might undermine the king, government, and national church.
_	FMI expressed the fear that legislation to permit metric-only labels might also somehow mandate resizing of packaging to round metric sizes (a process already well underway), and this could require expensive remodeling or replacement of existing display cases.
_	The news comes that Beverly's boat is missing, furthering the fear that he has committed suicide.
_	In 2013, Muhammad al-Amri argued that "the biggest factor in preventing their [Salafis] participation in politics is the fear that the Rashād party would become a replica of existing Islamic political work in the Yemeni arena."
_	When Lee returns to active work, she is suddenly struck by the fear that her entire life may be a false memory.
_	Surabaya did not commit its troops to help Wirasaba, due to the fear that its other ally, Tuban, would take advantage, betray Surabaya, and attack it from the rear.
_	They have the fear that if they continue they will be sentenced or that if they stop the spirits will go against them and kill them.
_	Women's suffrage in South Africa was complicated by the fear that the black majority would become empowered.
_	English philosopher, statesman, and author Francis Bacon (1561–1626) wrote an essay entitled "Of Suspicion", in which he stated that suspicions need to be repressed and well-guarded, because otherwise they will cloud the mind, and cause a ruler to move towards tyranny, due to the fear that his subjects are conspiring against him, and a husband to become jealous and fearful of his wife's interactions with other men.
_	Specifically, erosion on the hillside was growing uphill toward the concrete lip of the emergency spillway, leading to the fear that it would collapse.
_	Coto compared the character to Hannibal Lecter and talked about the fear that he inspired in the human authorities during the time of "Enterprise" due to Soong's actions involving illegal genetics.
_	In his notes of the Philadelphia Convention in 1787, James Madison expressed the fear that members of Congress would create new federal jobs, or increase the salaries for existing jobs, and then take those jobs for themselves.
_	She went in the fear that something might happen to him if he went alone.
_	Looking to the future after victory at the polls, the Socialist League was obsessed by the fear that capitalists would fight back once they lost power.
_	Raeder was obsessed with the fear that "the war would end before the heavy units had been engaged" and that the sailors would "fail" in their duty to the fatherland "due to inactivity", the last a veiled reference to the mutiny of 1918.
_	In the same way, Raeder always refused to appoint an flag officer with command experience to act as the liaison with the OKW out of the fear that such an officer might be a threat to his power.
_	British policy towards the Indians of the Northwest was torn between the desire to keep the Americans fighting in the Northwest, and to preserve a region that provided rich profits for Canadian fur traders, versus the fear that too much support for the Indians would cause a war with the United States.
_	Motivated by the fear that blindness would cause him to lose his pilot's licence, he began conducting online research about methods of committing suicide before deciding to crash Flight 9525.
_	With the fear that Pontevedro would become bankrupt as a result of Hanna's marriage to a non-Pontevedrian, Njegus lowers the Pontevedrian flag.
_	The tragedy of the "Daigo Fukuryū Maru" gave rise to a fierce anti-nuclear movement in Japan, rising especially from the fear that the contaminated fish had entered the market.
_	Restrictions on the ownership of Christian slaves by Jews were in place through the reign of many emperors, under the fear that Jews would use conversion of slaves as a means to increase their number.
_	Once they leave home, many street children move around often because of the fear that their relatives will find them and force them to return home.
_	As it turns out, the husband was doing research into immortality, due to an obsession with cheating death stemming from sexual abuse he suffered as a child and the fear that his abuser is waiting for him in Hell.
_	Furthermore, the Soviets chose to involve Egypt in the conflict due to the fear that an incident between Syria and Israel would likely lead to Syria’s defeat.
_	However the fear that he hadn't done himself justice stopped him quitting.
_	He expressed the fear that with the death of Ghosh the source for receiving means for the communist party from the CPSU might be closed.
_	Wright attributes this to the fear that many Scientologists have of bringing shame upon Scientology and of being forced to break off contact with their friends and family members within the Church.
_	The government then informed the Orang Asli concerning the communist rebels for the fear that they are helping the communist rebels.
_	For the fear that they demonstrate cognitive-behavioral approaches, such as therapy, are the recommended treatment.
_	This communal desire arose from the fear that the sin of one of their members would be associated with the entire monastery, and they would all suffer as a result.
_	Everyone looks on with the fear that they too would suffer the same fate as Darkrai.
_	The February 22, 2007 issue of "Entertainment Weekly" features a quote that suggests that the only reason Thomas Harris wrote the story was out of the fear that a Lecter prequel/origin story would inevitably be written without his involvement.
_	The episode ends as Erica accidentally shoots John, caught in the fear that her vision of herself getting shot by an shadowy figure was coming true.
_	In the famous Habeas Corpus case (ADM Jabalpur Vs. Shivkant Shukla), Justice Chandrachud observed: "Counsel after counsel expressed the fear that during the emergency, the executive may whip and strip and starve the detenu and if this be our judgement, even shoot him down.
_	The word "night" was originally meant to be taken literally to express the fear that many women feel during the night but has since changed to symbolize a fear of violence in general.
_	The plan was ready in the late 1980s but was put on hold due to the fear that this operation could lead to an all-out war with India.
_	The ADINJC was formed in 1973 during the fuel crisis, leading figures at the time came together due to the fear that fuel shortage would stop driving instructors from working.
_	Among other activities, the Club held an annual Halloween parade, which was attended by a crowd of approximately 50,000 in downtown Cincinnati, all of whom were presumably unaware of the fear that gripped the nation during the infamous 1938 "War of the Worlds" radio broadcast by Orson Welles.
_	The tyranny of the majority is the fear that a direct democratic government, reflecting the majority view, can take action that oppresses a particular minority.
_	It is characterized by a hesitation, reluctance or avoidance, to perform an action based on the fear that it will offend someone or cause someone to lose face or become embarrassed.
_	The book also examines existential risk from artificial general intelligence, the fear that superintelligent machines will destroy the human race.
_	Because of the higher degree of Islamic influence, the Albanians internal social divisions, and the fear that they would lose their Albanian-inhabited territories to the emerging Balkan states, Serbia, Montenegro, Bulgaria, and Greece, were the last of the peoples in the Balkans to desire division from the Ottomans.
_	This attempt was directly linked to the fear that the Nethyar Amma, or the "Consort" as she was referred to by the British, was becoming increasingly powerful in nationalist circles.
_	During the summer of 67, Eleazar ben Simon and his Zealots attempted to dismantle the moderate government of Ananus by imprisoning officials who remained from the procurator period before the revolt and spreading the fear that the moderate Temple aristocracy would undermine the Jewish nationalist cause.
_	Cramer blamed excessively optimistic pricing, excessive debt and the fear that company insiders would sell, dropping the stock value.
_	In March 1917, Djemal Pasha ordered the deportation of the Jews of Jaffa, and after the discovery of the Nili spy network headed by the agronomist Aaron Aaronsohn who spied for the British out of the fear that Unionists would inflict the same fate on the Jews as they did upon the Armenians, ordered the deportation of all the Jews.
_	The G&SWR may have been motivated to concede better terms by the fear that the Caledonian Railway might step in.
_	The main one was the fear that terrorists could use the feature to plan attacks.
_	"It's about the fear that can happen when you're approached by people that look like they're gonna hit you and it's based in this area, it's called Southampton Common [...]".
_	Works like "Who Goes There?" and "Invasion of the Body Snatchers", especially popular in the 1950s, expressed the fear that people are not what they seem to be.
_	Thus, while the idea of a Polish–Lithuanian–Muscovite Commonwealth was supported early on by some progressive and secular Polish diplomats, in the end the efforts of the few could not overcome Russian opposition to Catholicism and the fear that such a union would spell Catholic domination over the Orthodox religion.
_	Because of the fear that the Germans might find the secret printroom, the Provincial Committee advised Maksimovićs to go illegal, and soon in October they crossed to liberated territory in Srem.
_	This opposition came from the fear that independence might prevent any special United States visas that aided Caymanian sailors working on American ships and elsewhere in the United States.
_	Second, it showed the fear that the PN had of India's missile boats.
_	To Bedelia each marriage was a pleasure cruise and she an amiable passenger, always amused and amusing, always happy to share the fun, uninhibited by the fear that any relationship would grow too important, because she knew the cruise would soon be over, the relationship severed, and she would be free to embark on a new journey.
_	Also included was the pledge that any change in Taiwan's international status will have to be done through a referendum, thus alleviating the fear that, if elected, a DPP government would unilaterally declare independence without popular approval.
_	One was the fear that trade with western powers and the spread of Christianity would serve as a pretext for the invasion of Japan by imperialist forces, as had been the case with most of the nations of Asia.
_	With the prospect of no Waikato/Bay Of Plenty representation at national level, and also the fear that the NZFC would collapse, various people in the football community stepped in to help, some of the most notable being people such as Gordon Glen-Watson who had played top level football in New Zealand, and Wayne Bates, a Ngaruawahia United AFC alumni.
_	On 23 May 2006, Sandham in an email to Bare first revealed that Aragon did not own a motorcycle, let alone a Harley-Davidson, nor did he know how to ride one, and said he could not be in the presence of his biker "brother" Aragon out of the fear that Aragon might murder him.
_	Yet, to please the fellow, I put my hand upon the line, which we had made fast in the evening to a large piece of rock, and so, immediately, I discovered that something was pulling upon it, hauling and then slackening, so that it occurred to me that the people in the vessel might be indeed wishful to send us some message, and at that, to make sure, I ran to the nearest fire, and, lighting a tuft of weed, waved it thrice; but there came not any answering signal from those in the ship, and at that I went back to feel at the rope, to assure myself that it had not been the pluck of the wind upon it; but I found that it was something very different from the wind, something that plucked with all the sharpness of a hooked fish, only that it had been a mighty great fish to have given such tugs, and so I knew that some vile thing out in the darkness of the weed was fast to the rope, and at this there came the fear that it might break it, and then a second thought that something might be climbing up to us along the rope, and so I bade the big seaman stand ready with his great cutlass, whilst I ran and waked the bo'sun.
_	Another contributor was the fear that the economic dominance of Singapore's port would inevitably shift political power away from Kuala Lumpur in time, should Singapore remain in the Federation.
_	Due to their link to the local Algerian population via his maternal family, the kuloğlus' loyalty to the Ottoman elite was suspected because of the fear that they might develop another loyalty; they were therefore considered a potential danger to the elite.
_	We do not know whether anti-Muslim bias played a role in this crime, but I do recognize the fear that members of our community may feel.
_	Range anxiety is the fear that a vehicle has insufficient range to reach its destination and would thus strand the vehicle's occupants.
_	"Add The 4 Words Idaho" announced in a press release that "We are here to insist the Idaho Legislature finally add four words, 'sexual orientation' and 'gender identity,' to Idaho's Human Rights Act to prevent the suicides, beatings, loss of jobs, evictions and the fear that too many gay and transgender Idahoans live with every day.
_	"Archbishop McQuaid worked hard to arouse the interest of Irish public opinion in the fight against communism in Europe in the late 1940s, when after a communist take over in Central and Eastern Europe there was the fear that a similar possibility could not be ruled out even for Italy itself.
_	They kept the marriage secret for as many as 10 years because of the fear that Shyama's career would suffer if her marriage became known; in those days, it was thought that the fan following of female stars became less as soon as they married.
_	According to Mugur Isărescu, Ceaușescu wanted to take the country out of the IMF, but he did not act out of the fear that he might lose the gold deposited at the organization.
_	This was assumed as reasonable because of the fear that tribalist politics between the Kikuyu and Luo under a Westminster system would have been damaging for the other ethnic minorities in Kenya, including the European settlers and Asian residents.
_	The bombing was based on the fear that the abbey was being used as a lookout post for the Axis defenders (this position evolved over time to admit that Axis military was not garrisoned there).
_	He believes it is out of anger and jealousy and the fear that their incomes shall go down if the new message and reformation succeeded.
_	This combined with the colonial government's acute reluctance to hand over power to black Rhodesians—the manifestation of racial tensions, Cold War anti-communism and the fear that a dystopian Congo-style situation might result—to create the impression that if the UK did not grant independence, Rhodesia might be justified in taking it unilaterally.
_	Around 80% of the Vietnamese soldiers in Tonkin were transferred to other districts in order to disrupt any secret plots that may have been in progress, and some soldiers who had returned from foreign service were discharged in the fear that their overseas experiences made them less likely to accept colonial subjugation.
_	With uncompetitive seats/districts reducing the fear that incumbent politicians may lose office, they have less incentive to represent the interests of their constituents, even when those interests conform to majority support for an issue across the electorate as a whole.
_	Arguments against renovation included the fear that asbestos employed in the original construction was a potential health risk to the occupants and that the structure was no longer in a desirable location.
_	Due to the fear that his family wouldn't appreciate the fact that he wanted to be a poet, he changed his pen name to "Zahrad".
_	From that time on, the fear that it might be extinct gradually grew into near-certainty after the swamps and wetlands in Australia around Bass River in south-west Gippsland were drained for farming in the early 1900s.
_	The SFA's opposition to the plans were rooted primarily in the fear that the Home Nations would be forced to field a combined team in all competitions.
_	from the resurrection of the fear that consumers have for the mad cow, to the supplies from abroad, from the collapse of other companies, to the malicious connection of single episodes, everything has been lumped together to criminalize the companies in the group.
_	Stereotype threat is the fear that one's behavior will confirm an existing stereotype of a group with which one identifies or by which one is defined; this fear may in turn lead to an impairment of performance.
_	This increased the fear that the Netherlands would also be invaded, so on 12 April Dutch authorities in Aruba confined "Antilla"s crew to their ship.
_	An example of this scenario is the fear that continuous foreign immigration to the United States will result in the prominence of the English language fading.
_	The election of Margaret Thatcher as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and Ronald Reagan as President of the United States had brought about a major shift in the global political landscape and Kennedy Martin was motivated to write out of concern arising from such issues as the Greenham Common protests, the Falklands War, unrest among the miners and, arising out of the escalation of the Cold War, the fear that “born-again Christians and Cold War warriors appeared to be running the United States”.
_	Because of this, and because of the fear that this will continue, many investment banks have focused on becoming lenders themselves, making loans with the goal of securitizing them.
_	Peter then married Leanne while in critical condition, with Carla watching on, in the fear that he wouldn't recover to wed her properly.
_	I understand now the fear that cops live with.
_	It illustrates the fear that people in southern Israel live in."
_	The United States was also opposed to nationalization of the AIOC, because of the fear that the idea of nationalization would spread to other places, but the US believed it would be possible to reach a face-saving agreement with Mossadegh, under which actual control and management of the organisation would remain under the AIOC.
_	His sentiments were based on the fear that Zionists wanted to create their own state with an exclusive social and political system.
_	After calling on a dying widow oppressed by the fear that her infant would be taken to the workhouse, "a school of sin," Brown organized an orphanage for boys on Harley Street adjacent to Bow Road in Bow East London.
_	Without security of tenure, an office-holder may find his or her ability to carry out their powers, functions and duties restricted by the fear that whoever disapprove of any of their decisions may be able to easily remove them from office in revenge.
_	They help to portray the fear that the white media has instilled in its viewers.
_	One was the fear that creating a facility with too great a capacity to analyze the samples would discourage distribution of samples to outside researchers and effectively exclude them.
_	One of the main concerns of most individuals was the fear that both employers and health insurance companies would refuse to hire individuals or refuse to provide insurance to people because of a health concern indicated by someone's genes.
_	After the film, particularly the climactic "cauldron born" sequence, proved to be too intense and frightening for the majority of the children in the audience (most of whom fled the theater in terror before it was even finished), the newly appointed Disney studio chairman Jeffrey Katzenberg ordered certain scenes from "The Black Cauldron" be cut, as a result of the length and the fear that their graphic nature would alienate children and family audiences.
_	It was known by guard officers that when a company leaves its home station the boys of the community lose interest in joining the guard the fear that they will not be assigned to their local company.
_	In "Bushido", it was the highest honor for a man to die for the Emperor, and knowing of her brother's impulsive nature, Yosano was seized with the fear that he might volunteer to be a "human bullet", inspiring her to write a poem pledging with him to think of his widowed mother.
_	Many organizations are yet to relinquish such control, as shown by research conducted by "Campaign" magazine, which can only be suspected to be due to the fear that it could potentially diminish the marketing profession (Laurie & Mortimer, 2011).
_	The Roman-era historians Livy and Diodorus Siculus asserted that the law was originally conceived by the Senate due to the fear that material wealth gained from gold and silver mining operations would allow the Macedonians to fund an armed rebellion.
_	It illustrates the fear that people in southern Israel live in."
_	There were offers from the princes of the Iazyges to supply troops, but these were denied based on the fear that they might revolt or desert in a war.
_	According to classified information released by Vasili Mitrokhin, "[t]he KGB whipped up the fear that Czechoslovakia could fall victim to NATO aggression or to a coup".
_	The falling leaf is often used as a training maneuver, teaching the pilot to control the plane during a stall and helping beginners to overcome the fear that happens when a plane stalls unexpectedly.
_	In 1861, Lincoln expressed the fear that premature attempts at emancipation would mean the loss of the border states.
_	But there is one thing that you cannot take from me--the fear that I have!"
_	Most MUDs restrict the usage of scripts because they give an unfair advantage, as well as the fear that the game will end up being played by fully automated clients instead of human beings.
_	One day she feels the fear that drove her to her crime and asks to be removed from the room.
_	On the Elkahira Elyoum TV show, Dr. Hatem El-Gabaly announced the pig extermination was based on the fear that the bird flu could mutate in the unkempt pig herds.
_	One was the fear that trade with western powers and the spread of Christianity would serve as a pretext for the invasion of Japan by imperialist forces, as had been the case with most of the nations of Asia.
_	The movie speaks about young people who perished as a result of growing up in Soviet society - their conflicts with parents and society, the patronizing attitudes of their teachers and the authorities, the fear that there is no meaning to their lives.
_	The reasoning was partly that emigration was conflated with opposition to the socialist state and also the fear that emigration would inflate opposition armies.
_	“She told of her earliest sense of ‘the Almighty’s sheltering roof tree’, of the fear that came to her as she viewed this ‘secondary world’.
_	People did not at first know that People Like Us was a South African outfit and expected them to be from the UK due to the record company Passion who distributed their music was based there (The UK) and possibly due to the fear that the record buying public would not purchase anything that came from South Africa because of the country's Apartheid regime.
_	An opposing version is given by the researcher, Maria de Lourdes Monaco Janoti, in the book ""Os Subversivos da República"", in which she recounts the fear that the Republicans had in the first decades of the republic, regarding a possible restoration of the monarchy in Brazil.
_	The Royal Commission's primary concerns were with illegitimacy (or "bastardy"), reflecting the influence of Malthusians, and the fear that the practices of the Old Poor Law were undermining the position of the independent labourer.
_	The Easter Crisis of 1948 was the fear that the Soviet Union or Soviet-aligned Communists were planning an invasion or coup d'état in Denmark.
_	Watch voiced the fear that ethnic violence in Afghanistan was likely to increase due to the conflict between the different factions escalating.
_	However, due to the fear that UCAPAWA communist leadership might take over STFU, and that UCAPAWA practices might break the racial alliance between blacks and white in the STFU, the STFU resolved to leave the CIO in 1939.
_	She also finds a medical report indicating that Amy is pregnant, of which Nick denies knowledge, and a diary supposedly written by Amy highlighting her growing isolation, ominously ending with the fear that Nick will kill her.
_	Though people opposed to metrication expressed the fear that ignorance of the meaning of metric speeds would lead to slaughter on the roads, this did not happen as most drivers under the age of 25 had been taught metric units at school and through them, their parents were familiar with metric speeds if not metric units as a whole.
_	Even as a grown woman, returning to her Dominican roots, Yolanda finds she can never truly escape the fear that has hovered over her for as long as she can remember.
_	The Gouines Rouges were founded in April 1971, out of a wish to assert themselves within both the feminist movement and the homosexual movement, and the fear that lesbians were in danger of disappearing.
_	He eventually succeeded in passing his acts, which were moderate, but was strenuously opposed by the Council, and it was only the fear that the chamber might be swamped with new appointments that eventually wore down the opposition.
_	The main cause was the fear that the government would deprive the factory of its privileges enjoyed under the Special Economic Zone, such as duty-free import of components.
_	The final method puts China first in this global issue by not focusing on the fear that China will destroy the environment, but the hope that they can become an influential leader in environment protection.
_	Such is the fear that the corporation inspires in parliament.
_	Windigo (also Wendigo, Windago, Windiga, Witiko, and numerous other variants) psychosis is a culture-bound disorder which involves an intense craving for human flesh and the fear that one will turn into a cannibal.
_	Stricken with the fear that she would become a victim of radiation sickness, she worked feverishly to complete "Shikabane no machi" (“City of Corpses”), an account of her experiences in Hiroshima at the time of the bombing.
_	He stopped and resumed the project multiple times, expressing the fear that he might not live long enough to complete it.
_	Open captioning has been little-used due to the fear that it was too intrusive and noticeable to hearing viewers.
_	Wishing to understand the fear that the man must have felt before his death, Masuoka descends into a labyrinthine underground area beneath the city, where he sees human-like creatures that walk on their hands and knees and whimper like dogs.
_	In the Constituent Assembly, frequent arguments voiced the fear that the West Pakistani province of Punjab would dominate the nation.
_	Most scholars of the time reveled in the fear that devoting oneself to applied research would distract the discipline from basic research on scholarly problems – thus creating this false binary between to whom knowledge is created for, whether it was for the perpetuation of the discipline or for application.
_	The perceived immorality of contraceptive devices was linked to the fear that they might enhance sexual pleasure; like masturbation, the use of womb veils, condoms, and other appliances might "heighten the feeling," but "there is no contact of the parts, and it is morally pernicious and degrading."
_	Sustained on a diet of caffeine and nicotine, Deans drove herself mercilessly — consumed by the fear that there was always something more she could do to save the lives of the condemned inmates.
_	The Communist Party did not officially allow gays to be members, claiming that homosexuality was a 'deviation'; perhaps more important was the fear that a member's (usually secret) homosexuality would leave them open to blackmail and made them a security risk in an era of red-baiting.
_	The biggest challenge to the New Deal was the fear that the expanding federal bureaucracy limited personal economic freedom and autonomy.
_	As explained in "Fairly Oddbaby" Cosmo's ability for destruction is such that when he was born, all fairies were henceforth no longer allowed to have children out of the fear that another potential fairy baby would be as bad as or worse than Cosmo.
_	This can be caused by feelings of separation or departure from a loved one; or by the belief that others are incapable of handling matters properly, or the fear that things will go wrong if they do not attend to every detail.
_	There, she became harder and colder than ever in lieu of breaking down completely and showing the fear that now guided her, while the voices of her ancestors from the shadow became faint and hard to understand.
_	This was "based on the fear that intimate contact with the Canaanites will lead Israelites to imitate their idolatrous and immoral ways."
_	For example suggested by such opponents is the fear that these websites would start to charge a fee in adjustment to the new rules imposed by the government.
_	Because she had wanted to be both the star and director, studios continued to draw back from funding the film, with the fear that Streisand as a rookie director would be unable to responsibly handle a multimillion-dollar project.
_	It marked an end to working under ever changing, sub par working conditions and the fear that a pilot could be terminated without just cause.
_	She returns indoors and is seized by the fear that she could have been killed.
_	In the spring of 1943, Mackenzie King, who until then had tried to keep the Canadians out of action as much as possible in order to avoid casualties that might lead to a difficult decision on conscription, became obsessed with the fear that the war might end with the Canadians winning no victories on land.
_	In a meeting with U.S. Army officers General Gallagher and Major Patti, Ho Chi Minh "expressed the fear that the Allies considered Indochina a conquered country and that the Chinese came as conquerors."
_	Anatoly Lunacharsky, the Commisar of Enlightenment, was forced to accept that the school system would have non-religious rather than anti-religious education, due to the shortage of atheist teachers and the fear that such a system would provoke a hostile reaction by the religious masses.
_	For the creators the scariest part of the new Indiana Jones is the fear that the quality of South Park will eventually decline.
_	The issue this time involved "transit zones" and the fear that many of MTA's routes would be outsourced.
_	Other factors in their favour were the distrust by working people of anything supported by the employers, and the fear that free trade would cause wages to drop still lower.
_	He also explains that he didn't announce it sooner due to the fear that he was going to cause harm to himself.
_	The final treatment emphasized peer pressure within a neighborhood; neighbors could view each other's voting habits with the lists, and so the social norm of "voting is best for the community" is combined with the fear that individuals' peers would judge their lack of voting.
_	During the fight, Andrea is teamed with her brother Swordsman, Moonstone and Bullseye under the fear that she is a Skrull spy sent to infiltrate the group.
_	Rajesh Sachdeva, director of CIIL at the Bhasha Confluence, said the exercise of New Linguistic Survey of India had to be abandoned with “the government developing cold feet”, in the fear that this survey may lead to revival of linguicism or linguistic imperialism.
_	A harsh disciplinarian, Raeder was obsessed with the fear that the Navy might "disgrace" itself as it did in the last war with High Seas mutiny of 1918, and to prevent another mutiny, Raeder imposed a "ruthless discipline" designed to terrorize his sailors into obedience.
_	The fear that Crawford might die before the mob could get to him collided with the fear that the sheriff might spirit him out of town, and at 3 p.m., around 200 white men besieged the jail, captured and disarmed Sheriff Burts, and abducted Crawford.
_	British elite sentiment turned increasingly hostile to Russia, with a high degree of anxiety for the safety of India, with the fear that Russia would push south through Afghanistan.
_	That was due to the fear that Securitate snipers might attack the barracks and free them.
_	The traditional and conservative Muslims had the fear that English education may lead their children to Christianity, as they witnessed in Sinhalese and Tamil communities.
_	The lack of enthusiasm for the creation of private farms was attributed to inadequate rural infrastructure, which did not provide processing and marketing services for small producers and also to the fear that families striking out on their own might lose eligibility for social services that were traditionally provided by the local corporate farm instead of the municipality.
_	The motivation for this renewed attempt at a Cyprus settlement was Cyprus' impending membership of the EU, and the fear that this development would create an obstacle to Turkey's hopes of joining.
_	Another reason for the censorship lies in the fear that the rewritten first act might show parallels to James II and might create sympathy for him.
_	Kane described Steinert as acting very worried, and expressing the fear that he might finally have go to prison or be deported from Canada, which led Kane to the conclusion that he was the one who planted the bomb that had killed Desrochers, and was now worried about a police crackdown (Steinert felt no guilt about the death of a child).
_	He sent out letters to the Italians in order to soothe the fear that he would take away their citizenship.
_	By contrast, the Peruvian creoles would prove to be South America's most conservative in the independence movement due to the fear that independence would leave them at the mercy of the Native populations.
_	In August 2012, "Der Spiegel" reported that following the massacre, Germany began secret meetings with Black September, at the behest of the West German government, due to the fear that Black September would carry out other terrorist attacks in Germany.
_	UN Special Rapporteur on the right to food, Olivier De Schutter, has questioned the insistence on titling as a means to protect security of tenure based on the risk that titling will undermine customary forms of tenure and insufficiently protect the rights of land users that depend on the commons, as well as the fear that titling schemes may lead to further reconcentration of land ownership, unless strong support is provided to smallholders.
_	The obstacle to war between the communists and capitalists was no longer the fear that the other side was more powerful, but rather the realization that nuclear arsenals were now large enough and deadly enough that winning would still likely result in the destruction of one's own country and perhaps the rest of the world as well.
_	John Boyne, author of "The Boy in the Striped Pyjamas" (2006), has acknowledged a debt to Serraillier's novel: "the book stands out for me as a great children's classic – [it] was my first introduction to the Second World War in fiction, to the horrors of the Nazi era, and the fear that capture could instill in the minds of its young heroes Ruth, Edek and Bronia."
_	This further raised the fear that they were carrying rockets and motivated the First Barrier Force to intensify its efforts to destroy the remaining U-boats.
_	Following the murder of Aubrey, people in the area quickly suspected that the Ho-Chunk were involved which exacerbated the fear that more from the Ho-Chunk Nation were set to join Chief Black Hawk's band against the white settlers in Michigan Territory and Illinois.
_	Lincoln expressed the fear that the next Dred Scott decision would make Illinois a slave state.
_	The United States first began developing nuclear weapons during World War II under the order of President Franklin Roosevelt in 1939, motivated by the fear that they were engaged in a race with Nazi Germany to develop such a weapon.
_	Driven by the fear that Major League Baseball would be shut down for the duration of the war, Chicago Cubs owner Philip K.
_	The Albanians, because of the higher degree of Islamic influence, their internal social divisions, and the fear that they would lose their Albanian-speaking territories to the emerging of Serbia, Montenegro, Bulgaria, and Greece, were the last of the Balkan peoples to desire division from the Ottoman Empire.
_	The poem also includes Coleridge's views on the unity of mankind and nature and the fear that an invasion would destroy this unity.
_	Prosecutors declined to seek grand jury hearings in the fear that an indictment would incite vigilantes.
_	Much of his artwork commented on the fear that the Norway's newly-won status as a petroleum-producing country would lead to excessive pollution.
_	Although he was initially sentenced to the galleys, the fear that he would talk about the murder of the Duke of Savoy caused the sentenced to be changed to life imprisonment at St Andre de Salines in France-Comte, where he was joined by Roger and Marie de Bachimont.
_	She compares this fear with the fear that many felt during the introduction of the television and the telephone, as people grew weary about the potential for substitution of meaningful relationships.
_	Consequently, due to the severity of the act one of the most important repercussion is the fear that is instigated far beyond the initial trauma reaction.
_	Bowling believes it is the fear that the walking dead instill in the survivors, who lead them to do unreasonable things to survive.
_	David Herrmann goes further, arguing that the fear that "windows of opportunity for victorious wars" were closing, "the arms race did precipitate the First World War."
_	"The Pittsburgh Press" reported the fear that he might have to retire.
_	Teachers expressed the fear that bigger students could overpower them, take the weapon, and then use it against the teacher or other students."
_	In some circles, there was even the fear that a girl's marriage prospects dimmed when she became educated.
_	The lack of potential suitors has led to the fear that the club could fold becoming a reality.
_	In Oman, for example, some do not wish to discuss FGM from the fear that such discussion is showing their culture's dirty laundry to the world, causing criticism of a practice that they believe is purely religious.
_	There was also the fear that local paramilitaries instilled in their respective communities with the punishment beatings, "romperings", and the occasional tarring and feathering meted out to individuals for various purported infractions.
_	The second letter explains that Jekyll, having previously indulged unstated vices (and with it the fear that discovery would lead to his losing his social position) found a way to transform himself and thereby indulge his vices without fear of detection.
_	Sacks' position on gay marriage is evolving, however, as he has since argued that he understands "the fear that gays have of prejudice and persecution" and went on to say, in a lecture on the institution of marriage, that a world that persecutes homosexuals is one "to which we should never return."
_	Sherri Murrell, an openly gay former coach of the Portland State Vikings women's basketball team, stated that other gay coaches are hesitant to come out because "There's the fear that your program will be adversely affected, that you won't be accepted by your bosses and boosters, that it will hurt recruiting."
_	The authorities took the child from the home in the fear that the mother might sexually abuse the child.
_	Only Zaktan's willingness to end his own cursed existence and everyone else's lives, thereby eliminating the fear that brought Irnakk to life and sustains him, allows the Piraka to pass the test and continue.
_	Revealing himself a realist, and speaking, Salt says, with 'great sincerity', he nevertheless expressed the fear that his country:
_	Unlike the fear that exists within marriages, fear is non-existent within the Chambri family.
_	Unlike the United Kingdom, where early railways had been developed by the private sector, the state took the initiative in the development of railways in Belgium, partly out of the fear that large banks, like the "Société Générale de Belgique" could develop a monopoly in the industry.
_	In the novel "Revelation Space" by Alastair Reynolds, there was a political dispute in the human colony of a fictional planet called Resurgam between a faction who were in support of terraforming the planet and another faction of archeologists who were against terraforming due to the discovery of the remains of an extinct alien civilisation on the planet and due to the fear that any attempt to terraform the planet would destroy the valuable artifacts that still might be buried underground.
_	Pillaival is haunted by the fear that Gangamma would return from the grave to take revenge.
_	Given the fear that those PPH patients with high PAP will suffer right heart failure following the stress of post-transplant reperfusion or in the immediate perioperative period, patients are typically risk-stratified based on mean PAP.
_	The opposition to Swedish military assistance on Åland was strengthened by the fear that intervention would become extended to Mainland Finland, which few parliamentarians would support.
_	The dispute was engendered, in part, by the fear that the unfettered church could in theory create an increasingly totalitarian state with its own systems of punishments.
_	It was claimed that Erdogan's effort to save Zarrab was the fear that the inquiry had reached him.
_	He explained that an important factor in their support was the fear that the media was setting a standard for sexual misconduct that President Donald Trump would be unable to meet, “based off not any sort of conviction or any sort of admission of guilt, but based off of purely allegations."
_	In the major events of "Siege: The Cabal", Norman Osborn, having succumbed to his Green Goblin persona and the fear that Asgard would pose a threat to the natural order and Earth itself, gathers the Cabal once again, with Doctor Doom arriving and arrogantly showing distaste for Taskmaster's presence among the Cabal.
_	The PRC state-run Global Times referenced the U.S. "deliberately ignor[ing] the existence of the new ADIZ" to say that while some in China had expressed the fear that "the US seems to have gained the upper hand with its action," one should understand that the American defiance is just part of "the psychological battles waged by Washington and Tokyo."
_	The alleged danger lurking on the slippery slope is the fear that a presently unacceptable proposal (C) will (by any number of psychological processes—see, e.g., ) in the future be re-evaluated as acceptable."
_	In the rally, Palin’s supporters made racist comments about Barack Obama, Democratic Party’s presidential candidate, including the fear that Barack Obama is an anti-white Muslim terrorist.
_	He noted that in his interviews with them, members often framed Islam in particular as a threat to British values and society, expressing the fear that British Muslims wanted to Islamicise the country and eventually impose "sharia" law on its population.
_	One is the fear that every police officer wearing this technology could become a "roving surveillance camera".
_	Will recalls the fear that was born in him when he was introduced to military life.
_	Among the fears expressed was the fear that the Taliban would get a false sense of legitimacy and power, thinking that there would be no peace in Afghanistan except through them.
_	Thrasos didn't want to take his brothers fortune because of the fear that he might end up just like his brother but his wife Lena thirsty for money and luxuries had other plans and made his accept the fortune.
_	The Social Democrat accused Solf of the fear that "the influx of white blood" into Samoa would give rise to "a part-white, part-Samoan population, like the Basters of South West Africa who descended from Dutchmen and Hottentots", which would strengthen the natives' ability to resist.
_	But he chooses to become a revolutionary freedom fighter and abandons Mumtaz due to the fear that he might die during his struggle leaving her as a widow.
_	There was the fear that Chipembere and Chiume would align Malawi too closely with China, whereas Banda would be more favourable to British interests.
_	Freeman kept his Minnesota accent at all times during filming, due to the fear that he would lose it.
_	While searching for Karthik and his crew, Sethu encounters events that make him realize that the fear that people have for him does not equal respect.
_	Due to the fear that she would be adversely affected during her recovery by the shock, she was not told until 29 January 1979, that her sons had died.
_	Yugoslavia, although a communist state, was non-aligned during the Cold War due to the fear that the nation might be invaded like Czechoslovakia and Afghanistan.
_	E. Fay Campbell wrote to General Secretary Robert Wilder in 1925 expressing the fear that the Student Volunteer Movement was tending to become a conservative general Christian movement, a rival to the YMCA and YWCA on the conservative end of the spectrum.
_	Although the law would make street hail of livery cabs legal, it was not welcomed by some of the livery cab drivers and politicians due to the fear that the cost would be too expensive as seen in the yellow taxi medallions which are sold through auctions with an average of $700,000 each.
_	A quarter of Europeans are against it, possibly because of the fear that they themselves might be subject to this tax."
_	In 2000, seven foreigners were killed on the Cape Flats over a five-week period in what police described as xenophobic murders possibly motivated by the fear that outsiders would claim property belonging to locals.
_	The planned arena, however, was met with immediate opposition from the nearby Forum and its operator, the Madison Square Garden Company (parent company of the New York Knicks), as they accused both the Clippers and the Inglewood city government of "backroom dealing" and the fear that a new Clippers' arena will siphon events from the recently renovated sports arena-turned-concert venue.
_	Gradually the two of them become friends, though Nat is haunted by the fear that if his plans succeed lovely Margaret must die.
_	The mother hesitated for while with the fear that if His dad gets to know of this they won't be spared .
_	Mason argued that the Nazi leaders were deeply haunted by the November Revolution of 1918, and was most unwilling to see any fall in working class living standards out of the fear that it might provoke another November Revolution.
_	There may also have been some truth to the fear that Brazil, or at least its military, would side with the Nazis.
_	The results proved that the majority of families and caretakers of the intellectually disabled believed that those with disabilities should not engage in sexual activity because of the fear that they will be taken advantage of .
_	Subsequently, she assists Dom and his crew in collecting the God's Eye, stating that she trusts them more than her previous captors as the team is clearly brought together by respect and trust rather than the fear that kept her captors loyal.
_	Lassiter tells her that "it's okay to not be fine" and Juliet, overcome with the fear that she was very close to being killed, starts sobbing as Lassiter hugs her.
_	I know that there still lurks in me the fear that if I speak the truth as I know it, I will be locked up in a mental institution and then killed in public while a mockery of me is made."
_	Now the mood was conservatism, which expressed itself in the fear that Bible reading led to heresy.
_	He also expressed the fear that the large influx of Nepalese might lead to their demand for a separate state in the next ten to twenty years, in much the same way as happened in the once-independent monarchy of Sikkim in the 1970s.
_	Due to the high cost of technological development, the non-active participation of the riding passengers, and the fear that sidecars would eventually become something that has nothing to do with motorcycles, in 1980 the FIM banned all prototypes.
_	During the Kapp "Putsch" of March 1920, the DNVP took an ambiguous stance, reflecting a strong sympathay for the aims of the "putsch" without coming entirely in support out of the fear that the "putsch" might fail.
_	In 1861, the California Powder Works was established to meet a need created by the outbreak of the Civil War, when shipments of gunpowder from the East Coast to California had been discontinued due to the fear that Federal gunpowder would fall into the hands of Confederate raiders.
_	The expression "Polish plumber" became famous during the French debate about the Directive, referring to the fear that under the Directive a Polish plumber would be able to work in France under Polish labour laws.
_	The night without fire was associated with the fear that star demons, "tzitzimime", might descend and devour the earth ending the fifth period of the sun.
_	This transcription was carried out due to the fear that the doctrine would be lost during the upheaval caused by repeated South Indian invasions.
_	At first Nancy is only worried about going home at night and running into Jesus, but later she is paralyzed with the fear that he will kill her, having delusions of him being hidden in a ditch outside her house.
_	At the conclusion of the war the fear that the colonists would not respect the Iroquois' pleas came true, especially after the majority of the Six Nations decided to side with the British and were no longer considered trustworthy by the newly independent Americans.
_	The defensive attribution hypothesis (or "bias", "theory", or simply defensive attribution) is a social psychological term from the attributional approach referring to a set of beliefs used as a shield against the fear that one will be the victim or cause of a serious mishap.
_	A letter from Marceau herself expressed concern for her own safety, noting that the house where Chand, his mother and aunt lived and was to bailed to was only 300 metres from her own home, and the fear that he could attack her again going about her daily routine.
_	The term “Luddite fallacy” is used by economists in reference to the fear that technological unemployment inevitably generates structural unemployment and is consequently macroeconomically injurious.
_	As it was a time of heightened tensions between Roman Catholics and Protestants, the fear that she was secretly introducing Catholic practices was potent.
_	When the whole town was looted after the bombing, the Gala–Rodriguez House was spared because no one dared to enter the house for the fear that the bomb might explode anytime, not a single piece of furniture was lost.
_	The duo released the lead single of the album, "Hot Pink", on 30 January 2018, with a music video directed by Balan Evans released on 21 February, in which they stated they are "trying to navigate through a city where people's perceptions of reality are becoming more and more distorted in the fear that we'll end up the same way."
_	Sinestro warns him to overcome the fear that the Inversions have instilled him with, but reassures him that if he needs backup, he would not be deterred by the Guardians' strict territorial edict.
_	The main argument that interferes between a legal standpoint and a moral standpoint is the fear that assistance with suicide will be administrated to less fully competent patients.
_	British elite sentiment turned increasingly hostile towards Russia, with a high degree of anxiety for the safety of India, With the fear that Russia would push south through Afghanistan.
_	Sen. Lazarus Powell (D-KY) was of the opinion that "the only reason why the government of the United States has not long taken charge of the canal, is the fear that there would be demand on the national treasury to Enlarge it", a reasonable fear given the reasons for the buyout of the original owners.
_	If this is not done, the society will constantly live with the fear that the atrocities of the past can be repeated in the future.
_	The reason it suggested to have been the fear that she might reveal the names of influential people if she was questioned under torture.
_	It was the fear that the French would take this step that had deterred successive Weimar governments from attempting any overt breaches of Part V and VI of Versailles, which had disarmed Germany (as opposed to covert rearmament which began almost as soon as Versailles was signed).
_	This reversal was due to the fear that Japan would be less focused on ASEAN.
_	She struggled to overcome the fear that her family name evoked in the Sandinista movement and became estranged from her mother when she refused to intervene in the death sentence of Franklin, when he was caught.
_	They were seized with the fear that the extreme leaders of the Republican party would not stop at any excess and would deprive them of their property." (e.g. slaves)
_	In fact, according to the noted film and military historian Lawrence Suid, the fear that a movie might portray the extramarital affair was a major contributing factor to their ongoing opposition to any production.
_	It is theorised by both Axis and StarDrifter that the Lealfast are descendants of those Icarii who chose to flee from persecution by the Acharites in the fear that seclusion in their mountain cities would not be safe enough.
_	[120] An article in the Connecticut Journal expressed the fear that the proposed constitution might allow Congress to create such select militias: "[T]his looks too much like Baron Steuben's militia, by which a standing army was meant and intended."
_	Mister Fantastic voices the fear that the team would be unable to defeat him were he to turn to crime.
_	Despite the fear that the prospect of venipuncture may invoke, nurses agree that it is better to tell the child exactly what is going to happen beforehand.
_	Upon noticing the reclusiveness and changes of his master, Poole goes to Utterson with the fear that his master has been murdered and his murderer, Mr Hyde, is residing in the chambers.
_	However, Truman did not fully share such opinions, and throughout his tenure he would balance a desire to maintain internal security against the fear that a red scare could hurt innocents and impede government operations.
_	The convention was held behind closed doors, in the fear that a public affair would lead delegates to refuse compromising on contentious areas of disagreement.
_	Some pushed for change in the process but were opposed by the fear that a change will eventually lead to politicization of the Judicial Selection, based on political views and affiliations rather than their professional and moral skills.
_	King had tried to keep the Canadian Army out of action to avoid casualties that might require a difficult decision on overseas conscription, but in the spring of 1943 with the Allies clearly winning the war, he was seized with the fear that the war might end with Canada winning no battles on land, something that was certain to hurt the Liberals in post-war elections.
_	When finally captured, Walter Johnson was taken to a jail outside Grant Parish because of the fear that a mob might try to kill him.
_	Wilson knew that the leadership challenge would not succeed but thought he stood a good chance of winning the deputy leadership; what changed his mind was the fear that he would lose the mantle of the left-wing standard bearer should he not stand.
_	Her faithfulness to him and his mother was strengthened by the fear that any infidelity or lacking in her care of Lady
_	The Democratic-Republican Party, the opposition to the Federalist Party, emphasized the fear that a strong national government was a threat to the liberties of the people.
_	Wade's Blue Devils lost another Rose Bowl to Oregon State in 1942, this one held at Duke's home stadium due to the attack on Pearl Harbor, which resulted in the fear that a large gathering on the West Coast might be in range of Japanese aircraft carriers.
_	Archer asks May to shorten their engagement, but May becomes suspicious and asks him if his hurry to get married is prompted by the fear that he is marrying the wrong person.
_	In many countries, local and national government often refuse to recognize slums, because the slum are on disputed land, or because of the fear that quick official recognition will encourage more slum formation and seizure of land illegally.
_	Opposition to collectivization and the camouflaging of the true nature of the Spanish revolution by the Communist party was mainly due to the fear that the establishment of a revolutionary socialist state would antagonize Western Democracies.
_	There is caution toward such strategies due to the fear that these schools, purely as an anti-crime initiative, will lead to ghettoization.
_	This story also expresses the fear that comes with being caught pretending to be white.
_	He had been surprised to learn that he was chosen to take part in the mission, and expressed the fear that he lacked constitutional courage.
_	Sodeman had not wanted a reprieve because of the fear that if he lived he may have committed more murders.
_	The boy expresses the fear that they will catch the pair, and will bring them back tied to the tail of their own horse (dragged).
_	"The KGB whipped up the fear that Czechoslovakia could fall victim to NATO aggression or to a coup".
_	This point of view raises the fear that such attribution makes it impossible to hold others responsible for their actions.
_	Ana () is a Burmese cultural and social value that has no English equivalent and is manifested by very strong inhibitions (hesitation, reluctance, restraint, or avoidance) against asserting oneself in human relations based on the fear that it will offend someone or cause someone to lose face, or become embarrassed.
_	This was occurring at the same time that a massive debate was taking place over the use of the H2S radar by Bomber Command, with the fear that an aircraft lost over Europe would reveal the secret of the magnetron to the Germans.
_	He obsesses over revising a single sentence, "The fear that the human race might not survive has been replaced by the fear that it will endure."
_	After 2001 census the anxiety somewhat reduced when the growth rates were found to have returned to near normal level, particularly in West Bengal, thus negating the fear that there was an unabated influx of migrants.
_	The US is determined to stage a rescue in the fear that he will be used to develop weapons for the new Iranian government.
_	Tim unable to open his door and let Isabel into his house, overwhelmed by the fear that his destructive influence might reach even to her.
_	Anti-Federalists in the 1788 North Carolina ratifying convention opposed the new constitution; one reason was the fear that some day Catholics or Muslims might be elected president.
_	The neo-creationist movement is motivated by the fear that religion is under attack by the study of evolution.
_	The term "Phantom of '50" was later used to refer to the fear that Brazilians and Brazil national football team feel of the Uruguay national football team due to this loss.
_	Phyllis expresses foreboding and the fear that she will never see her beloved mistress again.
_	A former federal air marshal expressed the fear that the situation "will make crews and passengers in the future second-guess reporting these events, thus compromising the aircraft's security out of fear of being labeled a dogmatist or a bigot, or being sued," and that "Instilling politically correct fears into the minds of airline passengers is nothing less than psychological terrorism."
_	However, the trigger for expulsion was about the fear that Acadians would side with France during the ""French and Indian War"" (1754-1760/1763).
_	That these artists were questioned at their trial about their feelings about Christ shows the fear that authorities had about their influence on society, as does their ejection from Nuremberg after the trial.
_	Some men might not even want to marry an educated woman due to the fear that they will be deemed as inferior to her.
_	Tom John (editor of the ‘Rhondda Leader’ and the first Welshman to become president of the ‘National Union of Teachers’) said that “there was a laborious effort made by several speakers at the meeting [the opening ceremony] to dissipate the fear that this splendid institution would work serious opposition and injury to the county school nearby”.
_	Another argument is that the fear that injunctions implement on gang members is what leads to effective injunctions and have
_	What was different about the missile gap was the fear that a distant country could strike without warning from far away with little damage to themselves.
_	It was furiously opposed by the pamphleteers of the time, who spread the fear that Jewish emancipation meant universal circumcision.
_	Note: The point at issue in the War of the Spanish Succession was the fear that the succession to the Spanish throne dictated by Spanish law, which would devolve on Louis, "le Grand Dauphin" — already heir to the throne of France — would create a personal union that would upset the European balance of power; France had the most powerful military in Europe at the time, and Spain the largest empire.
_	Such is the fear that the pirates have for the Gauls that, having unknowingly taken them aboard—
_	"Behind the Backlash" is a thoughtful collection of examples that gives the reader an opportunity to grasp the fear that Arab and Muslim Americans feel every day, and could help said reader to see their neighbor for who they are instead of passing rash misplaced judgment.
_	While he does not call Einstein a plagiarist, Sommer speculates that Einstein's conciliatory December 20 letter was motivated by the fear that Hilbert might comment on Einstein's behaviour in the final version of his paper.
_	He spoke sincerely and earnestly expressing the fear that Waggoner’s view, if adopted, would direct attention away from the Adventist position of explicit obedience to all the commandments of God.
_	Apparently, the British cabinet's reluctance to accept this poisoned chalice was based not, as has sometimes been suggested, on the fear that accepting Taiwan would immediately embroil Britain with Japan, but rather on the calculation that if Taiwan became a British colony, even temporarily, a wholesale partition of China would have followed.
_	In practice, advisory opinions were usually followed, mostly due to the fear that if this "revolutionary" international court's decisions were not followed, it would undermine its authority.
_	Both candidates used their influence to incite white voters and help spread the fear that whites may not be able to maintain the current social order.
_	The men endure the ship's constant rolling and pitching in the huge waves, freezing cold, the strain of maintaining station on the convoy on pitch-black nights and the fear that at any second a torpedo from a German U-boat could blow them to oblivion.
_	This action was probably prompted by the fear that the factory, being British-owned, would otherwise be assigned to a German "Verwalter" (caretaker).
_	The hall was not full for the first performance; this was attributed to two factors, the high price of admission, and the fear that the building, without central supporting pillars, was unsafe.
_	That idea, along with the fear that the city would tear down the Market to develop a parking lot for the planned Greater Columbus Convention Center, drove the creation of the North Market Development Authority (NMDA).
_	In 1972, the school was nationalised by the then government, leading to the fear that the standards might drop.
_	A great dog hunt follows, which is later intensified with the fear that the dogs could be carriers of a dangerous bioweapon, such as the bubonic plague.
_	Hence, Gomułka was obsessed with the fear that one day the Germans would again invade Poland, which would mean a return to the horrors of the German occupation.
_	Key to English strategy was the fear that a universal monarchy of Europe would be able to overwhelm the British Isles.
_	In part this is due to Congress being able to amend the constitution without a complex convention, and the daunting requirements for holding a new constitutional convention (requiring the consent of two-thirds of the States), but also because of the fear that wholesale changes in the Federal Constitution might undermine a document that has stood the test of nearly 225 years.
_	Some possible explanations of gephyrophobia may be the fear of driving off the bridge, the fear of a gust of wind taking one off the bridge, a fear of the structural integrity of the bridge itself, or the fear that the bridge will collapse if they try to cross it.
_	This indicates that either police vigilance or the fear that the items may contain explosives have had a deterrent effect.
_	He wrote that when he questioned his mother about why their people didn't fight back, "the fear that was in her made her slap me into silence."
_	There is also the fear that personal "rationing" and trading of allowances will be politically unacceptable, especially if those allowances are used to buy from industries who are already passing on costs from their participation in carbon levy or trading schemes such as the EU ETS.
_	An alternative line of reasoning is that the Bombay Plan was a reaction to the widespread social discontent of the 1940s (resulting from unprecedented industrial growth during wartime), and a product of the fear that the movement against colonial rule would become a movement against private property.
_	The game ends with the player's return as a hero and the fear that the threat of the Assassins still exists.
_	When he suddenly found Kayako's diary, he discovered that she fancied Kobayashi, and then Takeo's suspicions began to manifest themselves in the fear that Toshio might not be his son, but Kobayashi's.
_	If so, this strategy was effective: Clinton received only three electoral votes, possibly due to the fear that a vote for Clinton was effectively a vote against Washington.
_	At one point, Shoghi Effendi was warned not to drink coffee in the homes of any of the Bahá'ís in the fear that he would be poisoned.
_	He surmises that Michael embodies a part of everyone; a part people are afraid will one day "snap and knife someone", which lends to the fear that Michael creates on screen.
_	Part of the anxiety came from the fear that he would not have enough money to stay much longer, so in his mind, "something [had] to be done."
_	The Ainsworth and Buckstone versions portrayed Sheppard as a swashbucking hero, and the fear that young people might emulate Sheppard's behaviour led the Lord Chamberlain to ban, at least in London, the licensing of any plays with "Jack Sheppard" in the title for forty years.
_	This rebellion was composed primarily of Métis supporters, but it also had some support from local Native tribes who had grown resentful of the incursions by settlers onto their lands and the fear that their people would be swallowed by the influx of people from the East.
_	He received a Commonwealth scholarship and went to Imperial College London, where he studied meteorology instead of physics for the fear that physics would lead to wars.
_	Its location was governed by the fear that the Germans might overrun the Middle East and Caucasus, in which case resistance movements would be established in Afghanistan, Persia and Iraq.
_	The West Bank had its first casualty when the bullet-riddled body of a Hamas militant was found in Nablus, sparking the fear that Fatah would use its advantage in the West Bank for retaliation against its members' deaths in the Gaza Strip
_	The purge that the Naval Affairs Committee now instituted probably was therefore motivated by this rancour, and also by the fear that the "old guard" officers would constitute a "Fifth column".
_	While moving the bill for consideration in the Lok Sabha, Gokhale stated that the fear that Parliament would "misuse the power to curtail Fundamental Rights once it acquired the power to amend them, was unfounded."
_	During the Gaines years, the publisher had an aversion to exploiting his fan base and expressed the fear that substandard "Mad" products would offend them.
_	Leper colony money was special money (scrip or vouchers) which circulated only in leper colonies (sanatoriums for people with leprosy) due to the fear that money could carry leprosy and infect other people.
_	His decision was motivated by the fear that French units under general Canrobert, which had just reached the left bank of the Sesia, could cut his corps in two.
_	The need for martial law came from the fear that the continuing stream of students entering the square were secretly coerced by anti-communist powers.
_	White was aware of the fear that the Iraqi people had of Saddam Hussein's regime, and supported the invasion of Iraq, but not the aftermath.
_	Initially, the working of metals in the new colony was heavily restricted or outright banned for several reasons, including protection of Spanish metal guilds, the fact that the work did not contribute to royal taxes and the fear that the indigenous would make weapons.
_	From the first generation Ananthan to third generation Narayanan Kutty, the film attempts to capture the fear that has been pervading the life of women living in different periods of time, at different places.
_	The Organisation of African Unity, however, refrained from redrawing boundaries for the fear that wars of secession could be sparked.
_	Anti-Catholicism among many of the English was grounded in the fear that the pope sought to reimpose not just religio-spiritual authority over England but also secular power in alliance with arch-enemy France or Spain.
_	His guilt grows ever larger, and he is consumed by the fear that Menzies will be found innocent and the police will identify him as the real murderer.
_	Li Tao responded, "Li Tao's fear today is the same as the fear that Your Excellency had back then.
_	The policy was so strict that the government regularly seized personal computers from foreign businesspersons who were visiting for ordinary business trips, because of the fear that foreign visitors were smuggling PCs to domestic users.
_	In her essay, “Feminine Wiles: Modern Art’s Fear of the Female,” "New Art Examiner" editor Kathryn Hixson highlighted Bramson’s unapologetic reassertion of the emotional and physical power of the feminine in the face of the fear that the article discusses.
_	Some banks in Hong Kong were reported to be considering relocation if the proposed Article 23 is passed, out of the fear that the laws would restrict the free flow of information.
_	The army was kept small by the government during peacetime, mainly due to the fear that the army would be unduly influenced by the Crown or used to depose the government.
_	He also publicized the fear that Adolf Hitler had given Joseph Stalin a list of closeted homosexuals which he believed Stalin would use to blackmail them into becoming Soviet spies.
_	His primary reason was the fear that Flanders, being more closely populated, would dominate a unitary Belgium.
_	The barrier that keeps them from remaking of the self is the desire for an "uncomplicated past" and the fear that remembering will lead them to "a place they couldn't get back from."
_	According to other sources he was murdered by a group of pro-Enver supporters from Trabzon, apparently because of the fear that Suphi might expose Enver's plans of political activities in Moscow and his ultimate intention of using the Bolsheviks to regain power in Turkey once the nationalists were defeated.
_	She is kind hearted but yet a very humble and reserved character where she makes careful moves around the house for the fear that her step-mother will inflict on her even more suffering and humiliation than she already endured.
_	Therefore, he concluded, the decision of the Chief Constable to end the broader review into the activities of the Glenanne gang and the alleged collusion of elements of the British state in those murders had resulted in a "real risk that this will fuel in the minds of the families the fear that the state has resiled from its public commitments because it is not genuinely committed to addressing the unresolved concerns that the families have of state involvement."
_	From 1907 Hankin suffered increasing ill health, and he was plagued with the fear that he would suffer the same fate as his father.
_	He is persistently bothered by the fear that he may lose his lecture papers, or mix them up with the student essay he is correcting.
_	Another argument against substantive natural justice is the fear that it may become an avenue for judges to invalidate laws on the basis of their own subjective opinions, leading to unbounded judicial activism.
_	A factor that was arguably more involved in the decision was the fear that the "Constitucionalistas" would bring about a communist regime in the country, and this risk of "another Cuba" was something that would not be allowed.
_	This is of special concern, given that the collective trauma suffered by a population, and the fear that this generates, can lead to a reduced capacity for decision making and action.
_	Suspense in thrillers is often intertwined with hope and anxiety, which are treated as two emotions aroused in anticipation of the conclusion - the hope that things will turn out all right for the appropriate characters in the story, and the fear that they may not.
_	As in the struggle to desegregate public accommodations led by Martin Luther King Jr. and James Bevel in Birmingham, Alabama the year before, the bolder attitudes of the children helped shake their parents out of the fear that had paralyzed many of them.
_	A significant motivation behind the Spellings Commission's formation was the fear that the American higher education system is deteriorating and failing to prepare the American workforce for the rigors and competitiveness of the globalized marketplace.
_	He urged Bradford & Bingley members to vote against moves to force Britain's second largest building society to convert to a bank, saying "the early day motion will express the fear that were Bradford & Bingley Building Society to become a bank, the entire building society movement will be damaged directly."
_	Cynthia and Joyce initially head for the hospital, but the fear that Cynthia will go to jail.
_	Safety & Security in Hyderabad: People in Coastal Andhra & Rayalaseema regions express worries about the safety of their friends and relatives who have settled in the state capital, Hyderabad and the fear that they would be considered ‘non-locals’ in their own state.
_	The 1799 and 1800 acts were passed under the government of William Pitt the Younger as a response to Jacobin activity and the fear that workers would strike during a conflict to force the government to accede to their demands.
_	René Lévesque developed the idea of sovereignty-association to reduce the fear that an independent Quebec would face tough economic times.
_	All of the fear that once ruled the kingdom being now gone, all are let to live happy and productive lives.
_	Rodricks asks Rashaverak what encounter the Overlords had with humanity in the past, according to an assumption that the fear that humans had of their "demonic" form was due to a traumatic encounter with them in the distant past; but Rashaverak explains that the primal fear experienced by humans was not due to a racial , but a racial of the Overlords' role in their metamorphosis.
_	In the 1790s, Jeffersonian democracy arose in opposition to the Federalist Party, primarily as a response to the fear that Federalists' favoritism toward British monarchism threatened the new republic.
_	They also expressed the fear that the new councils would not reflect a great diversity of opinions, a situation not conducive to genuine political debate.
_	Revealing himself a realist, and speaking, Salt says, with 'great sincerity', he nevertheless expressed the fear that his country
_	But he says that he is Kamal and he came back because of the fear that he had killed Rakesh.
_	The popularity of his tale, and the fear that others would be drawn to emulate his behaviour, led the authorities to refuse to license any plays in London with "Jack Sheppard" in the title for forty years.
_	A man of the world, Meyer exploited the rivalry between committed Nazis and other military and civilian personnel and perhaps, too, the fear that some of his interlocutors had of facing legal retribution after the war.
_	As they began to settle into their new lives, their logistical and financial worries were soon replaced by the fear that their children would be afflicted by sudden chronic illnesses.
_	During World War II, three gun emplacements were built on the eastern edge to protect Allied shipping in Waitematā Harbour, in the fear that Japanese ships might reach New Zealand.
_	The dissatisfaction of the Malays over their social and economic condition and the fear that the Malays regarded as indigenous ("Bumiputra") ownership would be lost, led to the 13 May disturbances.
_	A breakthrough experience is to help teams overcome some of their deepest darkest fears and help they get rid of the fear that is holding them back.
_	Objections were raised about the increase in taxation, the potential infringement on private enterprise and the existing library provision such as mechanics' institutes and the fear that it would give rise to "unhealthy social agitation".
_	The major reconstruction, paid for by Benjamin Guinness, in 1860–65, and inspired by the fear that the cathedral was in imminent danger of collapse, means that much of the current building and decoration dates from the Victorian era; medieval chantries were removed among other actions, and few records of the work survive today.
_	In the film, the death of her nephew serves as the catalyst for her offer to go undercover; in reality, she cited only the fear that the drug trade might negatively affect her own sons when they became teenagers.
_	The trauma of the end of a relationship can be similarly seen as an expression of the fear that a part of the self has been lost forever, that part that we projected on the beloved.
_	A year later, he formed a friendship with Natalie Buchanan, Jessica's long-lost twin sister, as he helped her struggle with the fear that she had DID like her mother.
_	Some major left-wing politicians expressed the fear that left-oriented refusal to serve in the territories will lend legitimacy to right-oriented refusal to remove settlements.
_	Armengol and other colleagues took photographs secretly due to the fear that their equipment would be confiscated or they would face arrest.
_	Some glory therefore accrued to the volunteers (a great many of the survivors also fought during World War II), but this soon faded in the fear that it would promote (by association) communism.
_	According to the former tradition, upon the death of Aeneas, Lavinia is said to have hidden in a forest from the fear that Ascanius would harm the child.
_	The decision to extend the railway from Barcaldine (1886) to Longreach was the result of pressure being brought to bear by parliamentary representatives from Central Division and the fear that the northern Separation Movement could succeed.
_	As Alsace and Lorraine were incorporated in the German Empire in 1871 as a result of the Franco-Prussian War, the fear that France would start another war in order to regain Alsace-Lorraine developed in Germany and some argued for a railway in the north-south direction along the Glan for strategic military reasons.
_	One example is the ban on merely mentioning Victoria Park in Hong Kong, the venue where the memorial gathering for the 20th anniversary was held, in the fear that it may lead to sensitive discussions.
_	The manga also served as an outlet for Asano's doubts and fears, such as the fear that he might be a victim or perpetrator of murder.
_	The Framers of the Constitution added this clause in response to the fear that states would continue a practice that had been widespread under the Articles of Confederation—that of granting "private relief."
_	Because of the fear that Raima will testify against her in the court, she bribes a nurse to change her medicines which will worsen her health.
_	A Mr. Clarke, the old retainer who had lived at the Abbey for many years, is reputed to have put about that a ghost haunts the Abbey, and seemed to have delighted in the fear that this had caused.
_	He did this with the fear that the Hungarians would follow their plan of retreat on the previous occasions.
_	Although he leaves his house to work and is no longer sexually interested in the now-teenaged Cassandra, the fear that he will harm her parents constrains her from escaping or seeking help.
_	It's like saying goodbye to somebody, then afterwards feeling the fear that you actually are alone."
_	On 9 May 2002, Amnesty International issued a statement to express the fear that Irani could be detained incommunicado and subjected to torture.
_	"Not a language of the desiring exchange of messages or objects that are transmitted in a social contract of communication and desire beyond want, but a language of want, of the fear that edges up to it and runs along its edges" (Powers 38 ).
_	In 1980 President Jimmy Carter, campaigning for re-election against Reagan, told crowds that: "As a traveling salesman for the American Medical Association campaign against Medicare, [Reagan] sowed the fear that Medicare would mean socialism and that it would lead to the destruction of our freedom."
_	On the day of the premiere, Judy is unable to go on stage—distraught by the fear that Kit may die during the operation.
_	Towards the end of his life Donne wrote works that challenged death, and the fear that it inspired in many men, on the grounds of his belief that those who die are sent to Heaven to live eternally.
_	It has been determined that this effect on STM is not due to the fact that a predator is a novel and arousing stimulus, but rather because of the fear that is provoked in the test subjects by the predator.
_	However, due to the fact that this tract also helped to expose many unsavory aspects of court life and political intrigues in the imperial government, Yongzheng’s successor the Qianlong Emperor (r. 1736–1796) recalled the tracts and had them burned for the fear that it would undermine the legitimacy of the Qing empire.
_	Prang and others who continued to produce chromolithographs were sometimes looked down upon because of the fear that chromolithographs could undermine human abilities.
_	The Swedish army was substantially weakened, and the fear that the power of the Habsburgs would become overwhelming caused France, led by Louis XIII of France and Cardinal Richelieu, to enter the war on the Protestant side.
_	The majority said that the proper interpretation of the Constitution was not to be affected by the fear that a power might be abused.
_	As the season goes on, Joan is clearly torn between wanting to be a well-off, married woman (the pinnacle of Joan's ambition) and the fear that she will become a bored, lonely housewife.
_	The traders protested for the fear that such law would increase harassment and corruption from local authorities.
_	These leading aristocrats were driven by their exclusion from the share in power and wealth they had enjoyed under Manuel, and the fear that they themselves might be imprisoned.
_	The committee seized upon the concept as a potential solution to the problem of bomber detection and the fear that the bomber will always get through.
_	Architect Sayeed expressed the fear that the Eidgah structure may have been weakened by the rig vibration during construction of the new building.
_	Inefficiency is caused by the hold-up problem when B is reluctant to make the investment ex ante from the fear that S uses its extra bargaining power to its own advantage.
_	Painter, who is commonly associated with vehicle pricing transparency, up-front pricing and the value of big data in auto retail, received pushback from auto dealers and manufacturers over the fear that TrueCar was responsible for significant retail price discounting.
_	There was talk of a merger however the three most prominent leaders Simon Donnelly, Sean Dowling and Roger McCorley opposed one due to the fear that the party would be submerged in a joint organisation.
_	The Iranian government views Salafism as a threat and does not allow Salafis to build mosques in Tehran or other large cities due to the fear that these mosques could be infiltrated by extremists.
_	An important part of the narrative is the idea of a demographic threat, the fear that, at some time in the future, Islam will take over Europe.
_	I may be haunted by the fear that time will mollify the intensity of our memory, that the event will be forgotten altogether.
_	Mason argued that the Nazi leaders were deeply haunted by the November Revolution of 1918, and was most unwilling to see any fall in working class living standards out of the fear that it might provoke another November Revolution.
_	The poor weather, combined with the fear that if it besieged Jerusalem the Crusader army might be trapped by a relieving force, caused the decision to retreat back to the coast to be made.
_	Call this quality the pathos of a poetic death-in-life, the fear that one either has lost one's gift before life has ebbed, or that one may lose life before the poetic gift has expressed itself fully.
_	Dean lives with Lisa and Ben for a year, but after an attack he insists they move and is conflicted by his desire to remain with his new family, his desire to hunt and the fear that he is raising Ben as his father raised him.
_	This was due to the fear that it would be copied by their rivals.
_	In the 1470s, Philip was actively engaged in a struggle against the Polish-Lithuanian influence over Novgorod, particularly the influence of the Metropolitan of Lithuania and the fear that Novgorod would defect to him and eventually go over to Catholicism.
_	There was also the fear that Palmer's past credits, as more of a wholesome character, would make it difficult to believe she could be scary.
_	Some scientists expressed the fear that important scientific evidence would be sequestered by a small group of scientists who neither allowed access by other scientists nor published their own research.
_	This American expansionism also drove Canadian expansionist due to the fear that the United States would look north and lay claim to the land before they could.
_	His 2012 book, Philosophy without Intuitions, argues that intuition plays a minor role - or no role at all - in most modern philosophy, and the fear that intuition is widespread has been damaging.
_	However, divisions over the appropriate stance to adopt among European diplomats persisted, coupled by the fear that the vacuum might be soon filled by other actors, following a Saudi Foreign Minister's declaration that the Kingdom was ready to step in and those of Prime Minister Hazem al Beblawi about the possibility to appeal to Russia for foreign aid.
_	Catherine is also a mathematician, but she struggles with living in her father's shadow, with balancing her demanding studies with caring for her father and also with the fear that she may have inherited his mental illness.
_	Anti-science dictates that science is untrustworthy, because it is never complete and always being revised, which would be a probable cause for the fear that the general public has of genetically modified foods despite scientific reassurance that such foods are safe.
_	Names of victims came primarily from extortionists arrested by police, and many of these victims denied it due to the fear that the extortionists would make good on their threats, either to out the victims, or to go after their families.
_	However, the fear that it might fail to establish its own look and identity that will set it apart from other shows is not really a problem.
_	One of Chloe's story arcs in season five involved her finding her mother in a mental institution, and living with the fear that she will have a mental breakdown of her own and end up in a psychiatric facility.
_	Writing against the fear that the growth of religion will increase warfare and strife, Micklethwait and Wooldridge argue that a democratic and pluralistic culture would help minimize these dangers while maximizing the benefits of religion.
_	According to a U.S. expert, North Korea has everything in place for a fourth explosion but is hesitating due to the fear that it would anger China.
_	The reason for this ultimatum was some suspicion that Denmark would incorporate its fleet with the French, or the fear that the French would secure the Danish fleet through military means.
_	The translator and Indonesianist Harry Aveling, in his 2001 anthology "Secrets Need Words", described Sitok as a "pioneer" leading poets out of "the fear that froze the poets of the eighties".
_	Sweden’s resistance, however, is due largely to the fear that such a policy would violate the relatively liberal divorce laws in Sweden.
_	This is thought to be due to the fact that more powerful countries have a tendency to be heavily globalized and thus have significant assets that could potentially be seized if a sanction was imposed, as well as the fear that a sanction between powerful countries could disrupt the economy significantly.
_	Obsessed with the fear that Luis José will abandon her because she is older than him, she has spent years playing with his emotions making him believe he is to blame for the death of their son although she was the one who provoked an abortion.
_	Trebitsch was acutely sensitive to the fear that he was not taken seriously as an intellectual, but was only tolerated because of his wealth and generosity to other writers.
_	They were also hesitant to engage in the early phases of the war for the fear that chemical weapons would again be used against their civilian populations, as during the Iran–Iraq War.
_	The other, more covert issue was the fear that the new mines' need for a workforce would start a wave of migration, bringing tens of thousands of workers from other parts of the Soviet Union to Estonia.
_	A year later when the First War of Independence spread to Lucknow and the sepoys installed one of his sons to the throne of Awadh, Wajid Ali Shah was imprisoned in Fort William by the British along with his Prime Minister, due to the fear that he could become a rallying figure for the sepoys.
_	Doolittle’s forceful policy and language reflected the fear that motivated American citizens and policymakers in the wake of Soviet communism.
_	He ruled by the divine attribute of love, and if his children feared him it was not the fear that he would visit punishment upon them, but the fear that they might displease him.
_	However, the most common criticism of human enhancement is that it is or will often be practiced with a reckless and selfish short-term perspective that is ignorant of the long-term consequences on individuals and the rest of society, such as the fear that some enhancements will create unfair physical or mental advantages to those who can and will use them, or unequal access to such enhancements can and will further the gulf between the "haves" and "have-nots".
_	Elizabeth Gaskell's tales "The Doom of the Griffiths" (1858) "Lois the Witch", and "The Grey Woman" all employ one of the most common themes of Gothic fiction, the power of ancestral sins to curse future generations, or the fear that they will.
_	A socialist worker expresses, in the pages of [a socialist journal], the fear that the Peasants' Party of Romania will follow the example of the peasant parties in Bulgaria and Serbia [that is, the Bulgarian Agrarian National Union and the Serbian Peasant Party], who, once in power, are said to have oppressed the workers.<br>
_	So that the people of Russia could live a full life, filled with joy, with a sense of peace, and free from the fear that you will be silenced, oppressed and exterminated just because you desired to speak freely.
_	The Mills murders raised the fear that Temple "hit squads" (ex-members who would "avenge" the Jonestown deaths) were involved.
_	Even worse, was the fear that a more powerful Argentine Army would launch a surprise attack on the weaker Brazilian Army.
_	In 2008, a slump in the distribution of e-Sports media was caused in part by the fear that video game developer Blizzard Entertainment would demand royalties from KeSPA, because of their intellectual property rights.
_	Due to the fear that rejecting the strong veto would cause the conference's failure, his proposal was defeated twenty votes to ten.
_	The early record of European settlers such as Cawthorne, Bull and Schurmann make note of the fear that was engendered in neighbouring groups by the powers of the Peramangk ‘Sorcerers’ (sic).
_	"The main consequence of the Ponce Massacre, like the main consequence of the other episodes of state terrorism in the history of our people, is the fear that has been planted into the people of Puerto Rico, the fear that has come to form part of the life of our people, regarding the idea of the struggle for independence.
_	The Coalition commanders held a council of war at Pougy on the 23 March and initially decided to follow Napoleon, but the next day Tsar Alexander I of Russia and King Frederick of Prussia along with their advisers reconsidered, and realising the weakness of their opponent (and perhaps actuated by the fear that Duke of Wellington from Toulouse might, after all, reach Paris first), decided to march to Paris (then an open city), and let Napoleon do his worst to their lines of communications.
_	Even worse, was the fear that a more powerful Argentine Army would launch a surprise attack on the weaker Brazilian Army.
_	It was due to be published in June 1940, but after the German occupation in May 1940, the publishers declined to publish Geyl's article out of the fear that comparisons could be made between Napoleon and Adolf Hitler.
_	The unwillingness of the Polish gentry to part with their money, especially for armaments, was entirely due to the fear that a popular monarch might curtail their privileges.
_	Xia Lin, a top official at Xinhua, later revealed that violence caused by both sides during and after the riots had been downplayed or wholly unreported in official news channels, for the fear that the ethnic violence would spread beyond Ürümqi.
_	"False ecofiction is based on the fear that something will go wrong, but true ecofiction is based on an integrative view of reality."
_	However, the most common criticism of human enhancement is that it is or will often be practiced with a reckless and selfish short-term perspective that is ignorant of the long-term consequences on individuals and the rest of society, such as the fear that some enhancements will create unfair physical or mental advantages to those who can and will use them, or unequal access to such enhancements can and will further the gulf between the "haves" and "have-nots".
_	Additionally, they recommended actively combating inequality by redistributing wealth via taxes and government spending, noting "the evidence of the economic damage from inequality suggests that policymakers should be more open to redistribution than they are" and "the fear that such policies will themselves necessarily hurt growth is unfounded".
_	Equally intolerable to many is the fear that, without it, moral responsibility would lose its customarily revered place in society and moral chaos would thereupon necessarily ensue.
_	These exceptions were included as a result of lobbying by the publishing industry, and the fear that the need to name the author of a current events report could interfere with its speedy delivery, and undermine the image of the news as objective and neutral.
_	Yet, "undue preemption" remains a major concern—"the fear that others’ innovative future applications of the law will be foreclosed.”
_	In response to the suits, as well as the fear that the negative publicity was hurting automobile sales, Ford issued an 'Apology to Jews,' the sincerity of which is a matter of controversy.
_	To begin with, as the tower was being erected, he was in charge of a "semi-military band" that played outdoors with the fear that the tower might fall upon him and his players.
_	The biggest concern deriving from the pressures of reviving the language is the fear that their children will begin to build an identity crisis while attending school, considering that it is taught in either English or Luo..
_	Despite later attempts to ban the Korean alphabet, as commoners wrote disparaging this about rulers they disliked, and the fear that the upper classes would lose the privileges of being literate in Chinese led to attempts to ban the alphabet, but "hangul" survived.
_	Another factor affecting the final push for the settlement was the fear that, if Ronald Reagan won the 1980 presidential election, he would veto any settlement favorable toward the tribes.
_	Civic leaders in San Antonio were cool to the league's advances, however, citing previous failed football teams in the city and the fear that the UFL's presence would hinder the University of Texas at San Antonio's launch of its Division I college football team in 2011.
_	In 1848, his family (himself, three sisters, and his parents) immigrated to the United States via France in September 1848, fleeing growing anti-Jewish sentiment, revolutionary turmoil, and the fear that the government would punish them for the revolutionary activities of their firstborn son Marcus Spiegel who had participated in an unsuccessful uprising against government troops in the state of Baden with Franz Sigel's liberal-democratic Landsturm regiment.
_	You don't understand...the fear that [the AFP and ASIO] create, and how they stalk...members of our community..."
_	The main reason behind that is the lack of information and the fear that the new standard is too demanding in terms of bureaucratic work.
_	In the border regions between Guatemala and El Salvador, those who see the Siguanaba make the sign of the cross upon her or bite their machete, while simultaneously banishing both the evil spirit and the fear that grips the victim.
_	They're deeply, even ludicrously flawed, but they're not figures of fun because they all carry the existential burden of loneliness and the fear that "in time it would mutate into something worse than loneliness: the surrender to it."
_	However, the weather was appallingly bad, cold with heavy rain and hailstorms; this, combined with the fear that the Crusader army, if it besieged Jerusalem, might be trapped by a relieving force, led to the decision to retreat back to the coast.
_	An example of the fear-avoidance model, anxiety sensitivity stems from the fear that the symptoms of anxiety will lead to harmful social and physical effects.
_	The parents of the daughters are always under pressure due to the fear that the groom, his mother and sisters will continue to raise fingers on their daughters all their life."
_	She explained that first fear is the fear that comes reflexively, almost automatically.
_	However, Schediwy also expresses the fear that if Deutscher's "uninhibited love of melody" continues as she grows older, and especially if the wider public continues enjoying her music, the response of 'advanced culture-theorists' would no longer be favorable.
_	He brought with respect to anti-Semitic publications Clemens Brentano[1] expressed the fear that after the condemnation of the Philistines and Jews, Muslims, Chinese, barbarians and Indians come.
_	NIMA's creation was clouded by the natural reluctance of cultures to merge and the fear that their respective missions—mapping in support of defense activities versus intelligence production, principally in support of national policymakers—would be subordinated, each to the other.
_	With the Guardianship taking Scotland one way Robert Bruce went the other, making his peace with Edward by February 1302 in a document in which he expressed the fear that "the realm of Scotland might be removed from the hands of the king, which God forbid, and delivered to John Balliol, or to his son."
_	At the second meeting one of the points raised was "That although increased family allowance might be the simplest and most equitable way of overcoming the poverty of large families, there was likely to be considerable difficulties in bringing about a change of this kind, partly because of the fear that this would tend to encourage people to have large families."
_	On the death of Peter II in 1730, the Supreme Privy Council considered Catherine as a candidate for the tsardom as the eldest daughter of Ivan V, but the fear that her spouse would gain influence in Russia and her own independent and capricious nature led to her widowed younger sister Anna, Duchess of Courland, being chosen instead, because she was considered more docile.
_	Taking a cue from similar events in France, and with the fear that if burghers' demands were not met, their peaceful protests could turn violent, the Sejm on April 18, 1791 adopted a law addressing the status of the cities and the rights of the burghers (the Free Royal Cities Act).
_	The Spartans however, in the fear that Athens might interfere in the political situation between the Spartans and their helots, sent the Athenians home.
_	If listeners first discover Hip Hop through a Japanese artist, there is the fear that they will never bother learning about hip hop's origins and simply continue to listen to strictly Japanese versions of the genre.
_	Canada's primary interest, however, was from the fear that an independent Newfoundland would join the United States due to their economic and military ties.
_	The United States developed the first nuclear weapons during World War II in cooperation with the United Kingdom and Canada as part of the Manhattan Project, out of the fear that Nazi Germany would develop them first.
_	The second, more serious problem is the fear that through misunderstanding and misinterpretation, Chen may have provoked a war without intending to do so, as the PRC has repeatedly claimed that any progress towards independence would provoke war.
_	When the Communist Party of Austria (KPÖ) received only 5.5 percent of the votes in the Austrian parliamentary elections of November 1945, the fear that Austria might become a communist ruled nation was lessened.
_	In this case the fear that is being created is initially a cognitive state to the receiver.
_	On the day of the elections, Cicero attended wearing a breastplate under his tunic in an attempt to raise the alarm in the Senate and provoke the fear that Catiline might resort to violence as consul.
_	In the US, there was considerable opposition to the Lavi program from the Pentagon due to the fear that the heavy financial costs would impair other military capabilities, there were also questions about the financial soundness of the project and that Lavi technologies may be shared with South Africa, which had a history of close military cooperation with Israel.
_	This song is the beginning of that e-mail, narrating the journey by sea of Hernan Cortés's army and their arrival to Mexico's shores, as well as the fear that the natives felt when they saw white men coming to their lands in strange floating wooden mountains.
_	Orga captures the fear that a man can be suddenly in charge of a large group of people who depend on him for their survival.
_	She finally tells her mother that she is going away, never to return, so she can pass as a white woman without the fear that Delilah will show up.
_	However, his participation was kept secret out of the fear that the film would not get a US theatrical release if it became known that a blacklisted director was at its helm.
_	Anti-Catholicism among many of the English was grounded in the fear that the pope sought to reimpose not just religio-spiritual authority over England but also secular power over the country; this was seemingly confirmed by various actions by the Vatican.
_	Robert Llewellyn even commented on a soundman walking precariously along the gantry above the set, "risking life and limb," and various other crewmembers removing nails with their teeth and Naylor remarked that some carpenters were hammering in other nails with their heads, humorous references to the fear that Jackson struck into the hearts of the crew.
_	Even worse, was the fear that a more powerful Argentine Army would launch a surprise attack on the weaker Brazilian Army.
_	They found it in the fear that we were not "believing the Bible."
_	In "Mockingjay" it is revealed that district 13 had an entire fleet of hovercraft, but had never used them due to the fear that the Capitol would retaliate with even more firepower.
_	Until the United States entered the war in 1917, the "Auswärtiges Amt" worked hard to prevent Chamberlain's essays with their strong anti-American content from appearing abroad out of the fear that they would offend opinion in America.
_	Concerns centered on two factors: the cost to make all the necessary accommodations for a blind student; and the fear that the Association of American Medical Colleges might frown on a school admitting a student who couldn’t see.
_	The purpose behind this legal principle is to protect an individual's ability to access the justice system by encouraging complete disclosure to legal advisers without the fear that any disclosure of those communications may prejudice the client in the future.
_	Even worse, was the fear that a more powerful Argentine Army would launch a surprise attack on the weaker Brazilian Army.
_	Gerecht stated:"We have no choice but to re-instill in our foes and friends the fear that attaches to any great power...
_	Panicked by these arrests and the fear that it was compromised by informants, Dennis and other party leaders decided to go underground and to disband many affiliated groups.
